However, I was completely wrong about Jane Harris' Gillespie and I, about an elderly spinster that isn't all she makes out to be. I simply adored the book and felt certain it would be short-listed and was torn between backing this and Song of Achilles for the overall prize. Maybe the judges didn't want too much historical fiction in the shortlist? Or maybe it was too similar to The Sealed Letter? Either way, I was most definitely wrong!
Friday, we will talk about some solutions in avoiding distracting backgrounds.
But! It is the last post so I gotta give you more than a few zzzz's to put you down snooze town. So get ready for the randomness 'cause here we go:
Connemara Peated Single Malt – 40% £31 rrp
Insensate! insensate! (yet I at any rate chant you,) O banner!
‘Kelly, do you think that woman with high muscular torsos can retain their femininity given the modern approval of the larger mammary?’
“And,” Jack added, “what does any of this have to do with me and Dora?”
“Did you ever have ten thousand dollars in ready money?”
2) How can I bring along enough booze so that I won't be stuck somewhere needing a refill?
***Because I think parents AND teachers can relate
This was done, as you will recall, because OG and YG were fighting horribly in their old room. OG likes quiet when she's falling asleep, YG likes to hum and sing (and to push OG's buttons,) and OG was ending up stomping off to the guest bedroom five nights out of seven, anyway. So, for months now, we've been plotting the Big Girl Room Of One's Own. She could not wait, I tell you, and it's been massive undertaking to get it accomplished.
So hear this, and see if it does not make your brain hurt as much as it does mine. I am not lying.
Male questioner: “Hi Will.”
My dad says that I "attack life."
Despite this it is, experts in the field of mental health agree that depression is a significant problem-affecting people worldwide. In light of this we asked Professor Vikram Patel which nations he believes provide the best services for mental health.
her compatriots,
And there’s that thought of his gun, still strapped to his thigh. It would be easy—just sneak off to the locker room. He’d been that close before, after Charlie. He thinks maybe this is worse. It shouldn’t be because losing your child should be the ultimate pain. But as he watches Fraiser wheels the bed out of the infirmary he doesn’t think anything could hurt more than this.
Most brick-and-mortar stores have a fairly liberal return policy. After all, if a customer returns a physical book for any reason, if the store can't sell that copy to someone else, they can simply return it to the publisher for a full refund.
Directors on Kim Ki-young (Kim Hong-joon, 2006) 48 min.
Unless I was doing it wrong, but I’m pretty sure I had it right. I walked slightly quicker than a strolling pace, swung my arms back and forth, and generally looked stupid. So I think I had it down. It’s just really not that enjoyable. Which was disappointing, because in the back of my mind I was hoping that it might turn out to be like Phoebe’s crazy running: it looks nuts, but it’s honestly kind of fun and definitely burns more calories.
A lot of expats complain about the buses in Lima. They drive too fast. They are dangerous. They seem to be totally unregulated. But I love them. This might warrant a word of explanation. I don’t love that the bus drivers seem reckless, that the bus I am riding could break down at any time, or that there are no emissions standards, so on any busy street I eventually find myself holding my breath through a cloud of black bus exhaust, from some huge retired Bluebird school bus with an oil leak, enjoying a second life as a public transport.
jazz jazz jazz, jazz, jazz!
Memorable moments:
“Did you hear…?”
I did not quit Facebook on May 31st. Because frankly I'd spent some time and effort cultivating a small community of people that (at least pretend to) give a shit about my life, my family and my various evenings spent toasting my toes in front of my chiminea.
If you know of a budding young writer, encourage them as much as you can. Submissions are always welcome…Positive Words magazine, PO Box 798, Heathcote 3523, Victoria, Australia. (see full details at right)
There are many ways that this question could have been answered, ranging from the politically correct through to the honest and commonsense. The fact that the staff at the school felt it appropriate to drag the boy's poor mother into school and attempt to force her to sign a form condemning her son for an alleged thought-crime is a damning indictment indeed of these so-called teachers. Those responsible should hang their heads in shame and be thrown out of the school and banned from ever working with children again. Politically correct indoctrination is a form of child abuse and those who practice it should be treated accordingly.
They are taking bets on when the first snow will hit. Most are going for the second or third week in November. Last year we got it in October, then the storm in November.
My beloved Nann used to say, “It’s not the dead you have to fear, it’s the living.”
Buyer reviews & ratings of Western Digital 450 GB VelociRaptor SATA 6 Gb/s 10,000 RPM 32 MB Cache Bulk/OEM Enterprise Hard Drive – WD4500HLHX are available on the merchant’s site, see it by visit the link below.
For candy-loving kids in grades 1-3 (and their parents too)!
Here are some of the projects I've created so far...
3. I was full of self-confidence, I thought I was gorgeous. I didn’t even consider that being beautiful and overweight may still come with health risks.
Conservatives also hate it when someone betrays loyalty. This is why they worship the flag, nation and military. This is why they go after whistle-blowers. And it’s why they will never overcome their hatred for Tom Hayden and Jane Fonda “giving aid and comfort to the enemy.” This is what was behind the flood of death threats to the Dixie Chicks during the run-up to the Iraq War. Conservative are the ultimate patriotards.
I think I will smoke up a turkey on Saturday. The weather looks like it will allow and I love the smoked turkey that I make on the smoker in the backyard. It doesn’t take all that long, 5-6 hours depending on the size of the bird, and it is a nice way to get a great deal of flavor in to a relatively low-calorie meal. I don’t eat ribs anymore so I see no reason to smoke any up until my summer cookout. Or pork shoulder, or brisket…. But the smoked turkey, not that fits the plan!
Amazon Sales Rank: #17351 in Office Product
“I was absolutely devastated.”
Bad dog!
2 large sweet potatoes
VOILA...within a week...the burn has almost COMPLETELY disappeared. I did not take a photo..and wish I had to show you the quick succession of healing!! At this time is is barely noticeable. I am hoping there will not be even a tiny scar...to show my..well, you know! I HAVE LEARNED the hard way to finally, pull out the oven rack!
Richard walked back into his house and looked at the clock. His day would start around eleven or so. It was only a little over five hours away but the expanse between the 6 and the 11 on his clock looked impossibly wide.
Here is my symbolic First Blogaversary Cupcake to share with you.
Cover with plastic wrap touching the icing or divide and color using gel paste food colorings.
In terms of parenting, liberals want a nurturing and caring environment for their children. In contrast, conservatives want a disciplinary environment. The conservative dislikes creativity in their children, while this is something the liberal relishes.
Part 2: “PALOS KONTRA GAGAMBA” (1963)
There was also a sweep in Solano County the same day. This article recaps their results.
Tasks:
Sift cake flour and then measure out 2 1/4 cups. Set aside.
“Under Presbyterian polity only the presbytery can dismiss a congregation,” said Anderson, regarding what step in the dismissal process would come next.
If we shadowes ave ofendd. Thnk bt ths & al is mnded. That u ave but slumer’d ere; whiL thse visNs did appr; & this wk &amp;amp;amp; idel theme; no mre yEldN bt a dream. Gentles, do nt reprehNd; if u pardon we wil mend; & I am honst Puck;
I want to tell stories and stories are what brought me to Rauschenberg. The wonderful stories that came from Rauschenberg’s long life are why I love him and will miss him. I love that he grew up in Port Arthur, Texas and ended up in New York. I love that Janis Joplin attended his high school in Texas but that they were not friends. I love it that the first artwork to inspire him was Blue Boy, a painting still hanging at the Huntington where it was hanging when he saw it. He hated Joseph Albers but went on to acknowledge his great influence. He once decided that he wanted to photograph the entire United States foot by foot and actually made it down Black Mountain College’s drive way.
"I want another flashlight."
from Chicago won’t let President cut
The way to go is to use ' declarative language ' just describing what we saw and then pausing. This gives the kid time to reflect on what you have noticed and also experience some inner pride or other feelings for eg. satisfaction. We can then ask open ended questions – how did you feel about what you did ? what were you thinking about when you drew the dog? What made you decide to end the essay that way ?
Message from “Hazur”
There you go dear reader-person! Tell us about the best flash you've ever read - here. Maybe, if it was online, you could leave a link. Look forward! And finally, if you would like to order a copy of this book (highly, highly recommended) please email Brian George on briangeorge711 AT btinternet DOT com or Stonebridge Publications on anni AT wiltonjones DOT fsnet.co.uk.
56 they
Hmm… that’s tough. I want to see some Beckett… or some Ionesco.
Morello: You know what they say. Mimicry is the ultimate form of flattery.
But the event is just one part of a blazing hot autumn for Diesel. From September 2008 expect Diesel to provoke and amuse its fans with something else very, very Dirty…something people will be talking about for years to come.
RJ Keep On Movin
I just want to know how to keep the calm? How to try to just stop?
Before they are skinned, animals are yanked from their cages, thrown to the ground, and bludgeoned. Undercover investigators from Swiss Animal Protection/EAST International found that many animals are still alive and struggling desperately when workers flip them onto their backs or hang them up by their legs or tails to skin them.
Told with Adrienne Kress's sharp wit and a great deal of irreverence, this Steampunk whodunit introduces three unforgettable and very ladylike--well, relatively ladylike--heroines poised for more dangerous adventures.
Today I was reading Mere Christianity and I came upon a section that I wanted to focus on, that I believe sensible when it comes to how we should approach the idea of marriage. Maybe I share this because it's the way I have felt about the issue, and reading it just justified my reasoning more.
Poet Junkie
This has become one of my favorite events because we have some gutsy women who love to attack the race. I’m expecting Phoebe Wright and Alysia Montano (nee Johnson) to do just that. Wright has been competing well since Penn while Montano just ran her first race of the year at Pre. My gut says Wright is a bit sharper and stronger at this point and so she gets my nod as the winner of this race.
You can rest easy with the knowledge that the school system in Phoenix is terrific, so your children will definitely be receiving a top notch education. If you like golf, you will be thrilled by the many championship golf courses that are strewn throughout the valley, ensuring that you will never have to wait for a tee time. There are plenty of wonderful cultural attractions to enjoy as well, from museums to sports arenas.
I embrace me, and that includes my bald head along with all my being.
Yesterday was a good day, a really good day.
We are so very blessed.
It is all of those things and more, but they are all the happy by-products of our primary mission, which is to transport our audience to another place and time. Therefore, I avoid "faire-lingo" in favor of the language of the stage. We wear "costumes" rather than "garb", we are "onstage" or "backstage", we have "characters" rather than "personas", we have an "audience" rather than "patrons" or "guests". I think of the Guild as a "troupe" or "company", rather than a "guild", and we "rehearse" rather than "meet". The difference may seem trivial, but I think it keeps in people's minds what our intent is, or ought to be.
Meanwhile, Huerta said, naturalists in the area and Manu National Park officials told her during a recent visit that a rise in air traffic related to natural gas and oil exploration in the region is adversely affecting native hunting grounds, forcing increasing migration by nomadic tribes.
My batch #5 was one of the brews I remember as the best. I rather enjoy Pilsner Urquell and that brew did rather well. Since that time, AHS has been modifying the recipe to make the mini-mash version and keep up with the extracts that they get. I went back to that original recipe for the hops and specialty grains though. I also added 1 tsp. of Calcium Chloride to accentuate the malt and used the Kolsch Ale yeast like I had way back in 1998. I'm still fermenting in the same closet.
Marylinn Kelly
The Big Easy (Brad Fiedel)
ONCE UPON A TIME, a man named Fred Rogers decided that he wanted to live in heaven. Heaven is the place where good people go when they die, but this man, Fred Rogers, didn’t want to go to heaven; he wanted to live in heaven, here, now, in this world, and so one day, when he was talking about all the people he had loved in this life, he looked at me and said, “The connections we make in the course of a life–maybe that’s what heaven is, Tom. We make so many connections here on earth. Look at us–I’ve just met you, but I’m invested in who you are and who you will be, and I can’t help it.”
They caught my attention earlier on this year as Canada’s answer to that Brooklyn indie sound; quirky, curious and soft.
Roll out pizza dough into 12 inch round. Transfer to prepared (lightly sprinkled with cornmeal) pizza pan. Lightly brush dough with olive oil and bake pizza dough for 5 minutes. Remove from oven, pierce air bubbles that have developed and set aside.
Sigourney Weaver surely earned the respect and praise she received from her performance in this film. The evolution of Ellen Ripley here is entirely on the mark. Being the sole survivor of such a horrific experience, she would be a haunted woman waking up in the middle of the night in a cold sweat, and be determined to see this species wiped out of existence. She’s traumatized, but is able to battle through that. She takes her fear, and uses it to focus her eventual leadership skills. You constantly see her battle against her intense fear in order to see her real world nightmare end. Weaver also projects a warm, motherly sensibility while caring for the equally traumatized Newt. The makeshift family they create with Hicks is rather brilliant.
Lacy's daughter, Jennifer Lacy, plays in the WNBA.
out of frustration
With such a narrow-minded, elitist approach, Mr. Cosby forgets all of the institutionalized forms of discrimination that bar African Americans from obtaining equal opportunities – consequently acting as a self-fulfilling prophecy in a catch-22 scenario. For instance, as Alexander alludes to, much of the African American youth are unable to construct proper moralities or serious academic pursuits because either they, or one of their family members, have been unjustly prosecuted against (e.g. the War on Drugs), thereby causing a disturbance in their lives that restricts them from fully being able to “prove to whites that they are worthy of equal treatment, dignity, and respect.”
Additional Resource:
Only her God.
Gyaru-inspired look. Lacking the nice hair/make-up, but I wanted to take a bit of that casual Western and lacy, feminine look that have both been ever-so-popular in gyaru styles lately, and put them into an outfit of my own.
You have 24 hours to comment on this post - and if you don't, another winner will be chosen. The winners of books will be posted after that (just in case the winner doesn't claim their prize - we want everyone to be eligible for the Grand Prize.)
Kuwait is taking a suicidal step by executing this project which has been cooked in the past few years. This will definitely take the country into a serious crisis as 1.5 million people will be forced to use facilities that cannot logically be able to provide them with good health services. Segregating people based on their nationalities can pen the country with the most famous scandals in the
Alice gets caught by Mommy but she stabs Mommy with a kitchen knife and the boys burst through the stairs and kill her. Daddy goes down to get Fool in the vault but Fool has wired up the explosives. He gives a Daddy a chance but he’s just a mad dog and Fool detonates the explosive and the Vault and goes kablooey and Daddy gets blasted through a wall and into the sewer dead. The money gets grabbed by everyone and the boys from the under the stairs escape into the night.
1075 East 20th Street
In my experience, the doors of the heart are rather exceptional. We are not always able to find them (or certainly not without difficulty). They are encounters with God and His kingdom and are thus not subject to our beck and call. Instead, such doors are a call to us, an invitation to enter.
“Bonsai art is the display of a landscape — without the landscape.” - Nobu Kajiwara
It comes with lots of shapes and cutout files, but you can also use fonts, shapes and logos from your computer to design your own cutouts. Or, you can purchase more shapes, letters and cutouts from the Silhouette online store and download them to your computer, like these:
There was a family of five, all extremely large, including two children who appeared to be 3 and 5 years of age. Of course the film held no allure for them so once they'd stuffed their fat little faces with enough sugar to bring on several diabetic seizures they spent the duration of the film running around the theatre, screaming and shouting at each other and their family members. The parents didn't say a word to them, the father sat completely absorbed in the film, staring agape at the screen as he shoved popcorn, crisps and chocolate into his mouth with the regular movement of a robot. He started eating and drinking as soon as he sat down and was still eating when he left. The mother spent most of her time playing and texting with her mobile phone, which she hadn't even bothered to set to silent. The whole film was punctuated with the most annoying beeps and jingles known to man.
Hey everyone, something easy today!
I'm sure you all have seen all of the Altered Paper Shoes out there! I love them! If you haven't~ Google "Paper Shoes"~ there are even tons of video tutorials. I got my inspiration through thumbing through Stampington & Company's Marie's publication from April 2009. I loved Sherry Murphy, Rebecca Stohlman & Connie Stuart's altered paper shoes!
Tuesday, April 10 - another track workout. This time 8 x 800 (half miles). Except for the first, each was at or below four minutes (8-minute pace). With warm-up, 90 second recovery jogs, and cool down, my total distance was 8.5 miles.
What with the bubba having a throat infection and the Frog being in Germany I've had a couple of days to concentrate on writing this week and do writerly stuff. I wrote a few chapters on the wip. I'm not altogether happy with them, but it did make me think: 'What is the purpose of these chapters?' and I think I've got that pretty clear in my head now.
Tai Chi Group, Wednesdays 1pm-2.30pm at Wolfe Road Healthy Living Centre – gentle exercise that can help improve mobility, suppleness, mental alertness and balance. Friendly and approachable group. Cost: £2 per session (first session is FREE) Contact: Mike – 0114 246 1795, Pamela – 0114 246 5511, Norah – 0114 246 6429
Do what makes you happy....it's your appearance after all!!
Reflections of metallic structures on the River Lez, with white tents in the middle ground and the new "mairie" in the background.
After finishing our tour around the gardens, we walked a different way back to the hotel (making sure we stopped for gelato), and called it a night.
A driver distracted by a phone is just as bad as one under the influence, and people realize this, which is why 2012 may be the year to “Get off the phone!” for good.
one before and he was huge, this was a younger
-Link your project in the below link system by August 31st!
I buy three beers (£3 each) and that's the end of my £50 quid.
Here are some of the best of the properly printed slides:
Preheat the oven to 250°. Preheat a waffle iron and brush it with melted butter. Gently stir the batter to deflate it. For each batch, fill the waffle iron about two-thirds full (the batter will spread and rise); brush the waffle iron with melted butter as needed.
Today’s Social Media Manager supervises the church’s social media teams to accomplish a cohesive, branded message for all aspects of church communications. However, rather than this being like your traditional Church Communications Director, it is more like Church Communications Director 2.0, revised and upgraded for the digital age! The new Social Media Manager will be comfortable with branding strategies, crafting an effective s0cial media strategy, interacting in a multi-media environment, and creating compelling messages and story lines. Excellent listening and customer relations management skills are mandatory, as are a mastery of social media tools and platforms required to keep the congregation and community engaged and excited about the ministry’s vision. However, the most important requirement is to have a heart for the church and the people, and a passion for communicating the Gospel clearly and effectively!
Until the next post.
Oh my goodness i just ate the majority of this hunk of watermelon. Watermelon is so good on hot sunny days.
Wayda reasure me google. Wayda reassure T__T
I used a mixture of different products for this layout, among others, My Mind's Eye So Sophie pattern paper, Dusty Attic chipboard, Imaginarium Designs chipboard, Prima and KaiserCraft flowers, Prima Alphabet Stickers, ZVA Creative bling and KaiserCraft rub-ons.
We bought two of these, which I'll arrange into an L shape:
“Oh, you’re real. Shhh,” Kira admonished. “You’ll ruin it.” The beat still in her head, her dreams fresh, she spun around, set his hands at her hips, and moved against him to the music. She caught her bottom lip between her teeth in a pleased smile when she heard his intake of breath and felt his hands tighten at her waist. She tilted her head back until it rested on Keith’s shoulder, and he lowered his to taste her skin.
Both Kate and I started forgetting things. Until I read Kate's blog post from yesterday, I'd totally forgotten the following episode of extreme forgetfulness even happened:
CloudOn is different. It’s a cloud service you should seriously consider if you work with Microsoft Office on your iPad and need more capabilities than the native iWork or Quickoffice apps provide. The 2.0 version released this week is truly compelling.
But, don't believe the hype.
As a man-made apocalypse unfolds, three strangers navigate the chaos, desperate to find others, to survive, to witness the dawn on the other side of disaster.
For better or for worse
We do well to ask ourselves in what way we may be stunting our growth in grace, and in the knowledge of our Lord and Savior, Jesus. What sin may be keeping us back.
well, actually, you get three of these, your choice. they were quite yummy too. so we rolled home and undid our pants and agreed that was a great way to celebrate ALL our many years together. let's hope there are many more, cuz i can't wait for all those dinners!!!
Another area?
and set aside the christmas posts.
The whole purpose of this exoskeleton is to “ease a soldier’s load by temporarily turning him into a robot”. Am I the only one who sees a problem with that sentence?
God knows, she loves me
Beat the butter and sugar together with a wire whisk or hand mixer for abt 15 seconds. (Don’t bother getting out your electric kit for this; it’s all pretty quick and easy…)
Silicon is an essential trace mineral needed for healthy skin, hair, nails and bones. Silicon levels decrease with age. Fruits and vegetables are the richest source of silicon including apples, oranges, cherries, grapes, strawberries, beets, cucumber, carrots and green leafy vegetables.
Over the years I have run into many businessmen who make the statement, “Whenever I get things in order in my business, I want to get more involved in ministry.” What are these men really saying? They are saying that as soon as they can get the amount of money that creates security, they will trust God. They are saying that what they have been doing to date has not been ministry. This separation of “work and faith” is common among our culture. We fail to understand that life is sacred to God and there is nothing “holy” and nothing “sacred” in itself.
2. AG and the Police falsified and tempered with evidence
Except, it now turns out that Naki with his Standard 5 education was actually a black wunderkind who in truth performed the heart transplant operation, only for the evil White oppressor to steal all the glory from him! But wait, it gets better! While googling for some background info on Dr Naki (in 2003 he received an honorary medical doctorate from - who else - UCT) I stumbled across this bit of “history”:
Her mind plays tricks on her. Her mind lies to her, but she doesn’t know that. She thinks those neighbors are saying, “she’s a crazy bitch”. She’s paranoid. She can’t think straight.
“See your Inbox…” (omg … what’s going on!)
Dear Bewildered: I’m bewildered by the terror that people can conjure up in the most sunny of circumstances. As for what to tell your 6-year-old, tell him he can always TALK to people, he just cannot go OFF with them. Simple, direct, easy for a kid to understand. And write to let us know if anyone else starts following your lead! (Actually, his!) – L
The preventive measures as of now consist mostly of advisories and guidelines to be followed by people and governments across the risk prone countries. Amazingly rapid advances in the field of pharmaceuticals and genetics are being made to come up with a foolproof strategy for development and deployment of vaccines against bird flu.
Dirty Harry was released in 1971.
Sofa King Low!
Impressions: I have been obsessed with pizza lately. And I’ve been wanting to go to this oh-so-chic (really, it’s adorable) spot in the sixth for awhile. So I got Jo to broach the foreign frontier known as the Left Bank once again for an indulgent evening of pizza and wine (holy cow, 16-euro glasses of Barolo?! Little did we know. Hrmph.). Yeah, the prices were a bit much. But the atmosphere and food sure were delicious.
Searching for a way to test the frangible qualities of the bullet, while making it dramatically clear enough to share with readers, Carteach hit upon a simple method. The frangible 9x19mm bullets would be fired at a hardened steel target which had been placed inside a box, allowing the cardboard of the box to record any fragments exiting the impact area.
I'd give you a quick tasting note, but we're cleaning the oven right now, and all I can smell is burnt sugar and meat drippings, so I'll put that off and add it tomorrow. Meanwhile, as I said to Cathy when I pulled this out of the box and caught the name...we've moved the earth. Okay, we've moved American craft brewing. If Boston Beer makes a Samuel Adams label out of a type of beer you've been championing, that's a good day.
I saw an interesting recipe for a turkey and veggie meatball on a Paleo website. I wanted to give it a try so I decided use it as an inspiration for a new meatloaf recipe. My binder was almond flour instead of breadcrumbs (I have learned I just HATE gluten-free breadcrumbs).
As the plane started approaching the Delhi suburbs/ Gurgaon, the topography of the houses changes to single or double story houses. Suddenly a flash caught my attention and looking in that direction I saw another unforgettable sight - fire crackers bursting. From ground level, we look up at the glitters these cause, but from the plane they are way below - just above the house levels. Different ways of seeing the same thing !
Security forces and protesters clashed in Bahrain’s capital Manama and several other areas Tuesday, after people responded to a call from opposition groups for nationwide protests to mark International Workers’ Day.
Sometimes I forget I started this blog to keep track of what's going on in our lives so I can look back and see where we were and what we were doing. I usually feel if I'm going to post something it needs to have a picture or a cute story which often holds me back from posting anything at all. So, there's no pictures here just my ramblings of pregnancy/house/marriage and what we're up to.
I do not think I have ever experienced something as unique as I did yesterday inside this body of mine. Granted, we had one hellofa full moon, venus was chilling with the Pleiades, Mercury is finally flowing forward and no doubt other planets are doing things my own consciousness is completely clueless about!!
Today I'm giving away a copy of All About Vee by C. Leigh Purtill.
Sounds a lot like we’ll be seeing some indictments in the near future by these pack of ….
On Saturday morning, pale and drawn with lack of sleep I rang my neighbour, Adam, to ask his wife if I could possibly take him along to the meeting to act as a human shield. He’s an allotment holder and has done some wonderful illustrations for the allotment book, so it wouldn’t seem too odd if he came along. More to the point, he’s about six foot three and has a very good line in Hard Stares…
Sobbing uncontrollably, Kym Marsh tried to pull herself together after her fiancé Jamie Lomas was accused of cheating last week. But instead of demanding he pack his bags, the Coronation Street star, who has a one-year-old daughter with Jamie, is determined to make their relationship work.
Human Rights organizations of all religious persuasions have been speaking out against the Gaza siege, joined by an expanding outcry from non-governmental and governmental organizations throughout the world. While leaders of the Muslim community in the US are calling for a special prayer during the Muslim Friday Prayers today, MuslimBridges.org is calling on all Churches and Synagogues to join with Muslims in prayers, and denounce the Israeli siege during the Jewish services on Friday night and Saturday, and the Christian services on Sunday.
"Halloween Abstract" is just the first of Jeff's designs that we'll be charting and distributing. So you'll want to keep an eye out for them in the next few months. Meanwhile, click on over to pick up the chart or the kit. And while you're at it, browse our new items.
Then I discovered that it has the facility to allow you to set yourself a challenge to read a certain number of books a year. I've never, ever, considered how many books I read in a year. I know only that some years I read a lot, and other years I read bugger all. But I'm trying to take myself in hand and live with a bit more purpose. It's all very well being spontaneous. Lovely, in fact, when one is young and has all the time in the world. However it gets less lovely when one reaches my age and finds the most spontaneous thing one manages, on a regular basis, is to have an extra biscuit with a cup of tea. So I set my challenge to read a hundred books this year. If I – spontaneously – read more, all well and good.
I have looked at Books/Dvd's/Blogs...to me it just doesn't look the way it should..well I am blaming my old machine but when it all boils down I think it is my Perfectionism..as a youngster and taught to Knit 'you can't have wholes so you unpick'...same as for our patchwork and applique...if it doesn't look right try try again...
Just this past week I had the pleasure of making a beautiful stack ring for a customer to wear on her wedding ring finger in memory of her late husband. This stack ring set meant a lot to her, as it did me to make. It turned out so well, that I now have 5 orders (and counting) for others to make with children's names, family, and husbands names Such a personal item and unique piece for your jewelry box.
To get better shares, instead of typing a post, upload a picture and write a comment on the photo with the link. Having a great photo increases the shares much better. Anytime you can get the focus off the text and onto the photo instead, you're much better off.
That’s one side of it. The other side is that a lot of work needs to be done before having a breakthrough idea becomes a possibility. That starts with getting an education. If your flashes of brilliance are based on whatever you remember from high school math classes, then chances are that you just rediscovered a first year calculus result – or that your idea has already been considered and rejected multiple times. Fast-forward to the point where we already have the background knowledge and technical chops and can start sizing up a research problem. If our “divergent thoughts” indeed originate in the most paranoid, schizophrenic, depressed corners of our mind, all that knowledge and understanding needs to be communicated over there first. Moreover, those corners need to be willing to take very specific directions from the healthy part of our mind as to what problem they are supposed to work on. Somehow, I used to think that mental illness involved losing control of mental functions.
Where is Harry Chapin when you need him? The popular folk singer (Cat’s in the Cradle), who lost his life in an auto crash 27 years ago, was an indefatigable force of nature against hunger—in this country and around the world.
Currently in order to get a philosophical exemption, one has to simply write and sign a piece of paper and send it to the appropriate place. The new suggestion is that in addition to that piece of paper, parents must also go to a doctor and listen to them lay out the benefits and risks of vaccinations, the doctor must write a letter, sign it and then the parent must write another letter and sign that one. This must also happen again once the child reaches grade 7 and applies to children who are homeschooled as well.
Those who know me, know that they have to drag me away once I start 'colouring in', because I get all enthused about new gadgets and colours and effects. I try to remember that 'less is more', but it's so hard because I want to add more and more and more.....
Then He said to them all, “If anyone wants to come with Me, he must deny himself, take up his cross daily, and follow Me. (Luke 9:23)
Would you vote for me please?? And tell all your friends to vote, too?!
My eldest daughter, Elizabeth, is expecting her first baby, our first grandchild! (Although, Jim and I have grandchildren already on his side of the family, this will be our first American grandchild)
Because swelling laptop batteries is a lovely Easter egg, an unsung Mac “feature”, and searching on the phrase “swollen laptop battery” brings up references only to Apple Macbooks.
My life feels like that guitar riff
24''x36"
As the film begins we meet Sonia, a chambermaid about to start cleaning a hotel room in Turin, Italy. She goes about her business while the hotel room’s occupant is still there. This person, a woman, comes in and watches Sonia briefly. A moment or so later, we hear a noise and the hotel guest is no longer in the room.
Attorney Evolutionist: How long Goo?
Favorite Non-Hardcore Record: (tie) M83-Hurry Up, We’re Dreaming/Cold Cave-Cherish The Light Years
“All it would do is further add to the confusion that the public will have wondering whether or not this person with a gun is in the process of doing something unlawful or not,” said Orange County Sheriff Jerry Demings.
I will not be updating this Blog anymore, there just is not enough time in the day to keep all the sites up to date. I was going to delete this Blog but I know some people use it as means of getting to my Flickr and Picasa sites. So those links will remain but no further blogs will be posted.
Stephie.
“Good. That I can do.”
I've never forced myself to push away
they will celebrate Beltane
I have a confession. I was not keen on Lawrence Krauss’s new book on the origin of the universe, A Universe from Nothing: Why there is Something Rather Than Nothing. I couldn’t share the chorus of approbation and acclaim for the book, and wondered if I, as opposed to everyone else, was blind to its merits. (Let me hasten to add that I am a big fan of Krauss’s public lectures, and also that I haven’t read any of his other books.)
Commenter pigpaws had this to say:
While the cakes are in the oven, mix the mascarpone cheese with the icing sugar and put it back in the fridge to chill.
When you arrive at the ‘dock’ and try to jump gracefully off the boat (step on the palm leaves to avoid the mud), you have to walk for 5 minutes through the jungle. The noise of cicadas, birds, and all kinds of life buzzing, screeching and chattering surrounds you in an instant. As we crossed a wooden bridge, a curious monkey came down to meet us.
"You should not be speaking to the likes of Mr. Murray, Miss Farnham. He's only a ship's surgeon. You are in enough trouble, young lady, you do not need to be looking for more..."
The OXO Salad Spinner is one kitchen gadget that I never knew I needed! We all know it can be a hassle when you rinse your salad greens, or even berries to dry them before serving without using tons of paper towels or waiting for ever. This handle little gizmo does all of the work for you! A quick, green alternative :)
Anything. I’m willing.
but the Blessed Sacrament was and is there so this ugly act is inexcusable. It costs $40,920.00 to go to Georgetown U. full time. For that kind of money--and lab fees, room and board are not included in that figure, I expect a kid to act like he or she wasn’t raised in a saloon. What a bunch of spoiled brats. Clearly somebody needs to be expelled and have their extended adolescence brought to a sudden but overdue end.
application effectively has the same U.S. filing date as the PCT application.
When fruit is re-hydrated, cook on low for 15 minutes, adding sugar to taste (I find the fruit sweet enough so I don’t add sugar, but you may prefer it sweeter), cinnamon and lemon zest. Mash with a potato masher until you have a puree.
1. I've been rereading Harry Potter
Britain's biggest firms are ‘spectacularly unsuccessful’ at promoting high-flying women to top jobs, management experts warn. In a report today, the School of Management at Cranfield University, Bedfordshire, says firms are good at hiring young women to junior jobs, but too few make it to the top.
Swimming, rock climbing, sky diving (indoors and out), shark diving, driving (i.e. not to Tesco), bmx, skiing, mountain biking, whale kayaking, zorbing, mountaineering, wall climbing, abseiling, white water rafting, blo carting, bob sleighing, coasteering, canyoning, hotdogging, kite buggying, sandboarding, zap cats (boats apparently), sphering, rat running, mountain boarding, paragliding, bungee jumping (in volcanoes of course) cave diving, ziplining, Ghengis Khan Warrior training (for real!), heli-biking, storm chasing, skate boarding (and not just down your local park) free running…and of course ( one for the ladies) extreme ironing….(a female ironing in the Blokesnet household is about as frequent as Halley’s Comet these days)
Then I called Joolie to set up dinner plans and then was off to trade in some CDs. Waterloo Records was staunch in their no-Texas-ID-no-trading-in-IDs policy, so I headed to End of an Ear which was second on my list only due to geography. Having no ID policy and by virtue of the owners knowing me, I traded in some unwanted music for the new Vaselines compilation (Remastered! Live versions! Naïve, superfun pop!), Baby Loves a Funny Bunny by Fuck (in a wonderfully designed matchbook package), and classic album that will end up as a gift for a friend and therefore will not be mentioned by name here. And I still have an $ 0.80 credit! While at the store, I happened into an in-store for Here We Are Magic, who were opening for Grizzly Bear that night. I liked them well enough.
Whether this goal can be achieved through serving a sentence in a juvenile enforcement institution or through other means (as here: several years in an institution for educational support and maintenance of the standards of behavior maintained there), must be decided in each individual case. In this case, it is first and foremost a question of the defendant’s personality, so generalized considerations are not possible.
Rachel opened her mouth to answer. She actually had cleaned her room. Well, at least she moved the dirty clothes from the floor to the laundry basket.
He has appointed us to bear fruit. What fruit? Fruit that lasts! The only real fruit that will last, when all else has given way, is our love for one another. But still I think preachers are terrified to preach this sort of sacrificial obedient love to congregations. You know what I mean: God wants ME to be happy and successful and fulfilled. That message sells, and big time in this current configuration of the world. But what about the demanding, sacrificial love that lays down its life for others? What about the sort of love that fails to consider whatever benefits we might otherwise enjoy? What about the sort of love that gives of the self and keeps on giving?
None of this makes sense to you (except to Mary). But I'm writing about it because it has captured my imagination and soaked up my time, and that's why my last post was, um, a long time ago. Oh yes, and because the kids love it.
Close That Door – Tigermen
We are happy to report that so far, the boys are very well and excited about our trip!
And we did find out what a very difficult job it is sailing a square rigger with no keel and simple rig in a season with way too much wind: and it's pointless rowing with 30 degree roll - so our callouses were nothing much to show. No wonder it took him 9 years to get back. Our particular Argo is no more (a sad story) but I did hold one of her great, heavy oars again in a ship museum in Eyemouth of all places. And identifed the black ring where the lead counterweight was jammed on, perfectly positioned to thwack into the spine of the rower in front if you got your stroke wrong. A thousand miles of that? They must have been heroes.
Too much fun and I'm only half way done.
ANYWAY i started my personal training and i LOVE my trainer Evan - he's awesome and makes me WORK - we do a FULL body work out but with muscle confusion so the body can reach its ultimate goal - he's supportive and a true light to my future - i can see the amazing results WILL be coming and he has the faith that since i put the weight on so quick, it'll come off really quick as well - we're also working on a plan to get this body the most SOLID it has ever been - psyched here!
We don't know. We don't even know if his father had a cherry tree.
I put a clove of garlic in a plastic storage container. Secured the lid and gave it a few shakes.
(It's not called Oak Grove for nothing)
But beyond the vagaries of talls/petites, we've all got different shapes. We know that there are pears, apples, hourglasses, and columns. There are probably other shapes as well. When you're plus sized, those shapes become more accentuated, and thus adds to the difficulty of finding clothes that fit you. I'm a whole size larger on bottom versus top, so I have a hard time finding dresses that work -- unless they have a full skirt from the waist, they're either too tight around the hips or too baggy on top. (Of course, I know a lot of women, of all size ranges, have that problem.)
There are several movies that didn’t make the top five but were worthy of mentioning here. Beetle Juice (1988) was one of Tim Burton’s most bizarre and delightful films, and the delightfully kitschy afterlife still resonates with hipsters everywhere – I would love to do the calypso to Harry Belafonte in the next life. The Ghost and Mrs. Muir (1947) explored the love between the dead and the living much more believably than the over-earnest (and in the case of Demi Moore, overacted) Ghost. A Christmas Carol (1938) is my all-time favorite holiday film but doesn’t make this list because it is the Spirits that are the central supernatural characters, not Jacob Marley’s ghost. Finally, 13 Ghosts (2001) had some truly terrifying images but just missed because the means of seeing the dead people came with wearing special glasses, and this list is organic if nothing else.
I posted this pic yesterday and some of you thought I had a double lot! Hilarious. Yes darling, we couldn't decide which pool we liked, so we built two! Actually, our neighbors were so excited about Fence Me In and their stellar work, they are getting a new fence at the same time.
We got a question that came in to us and — let me put it up there and I’ll read it to you. “How would you phase out Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac? Does the private mortgage industry need additional regulation?” — that from William Schmidt.
My overseas readers will no doubt be asking, though, what means this saying "Every Cow Has a Silver Lining"? Although not my Spanish readers, who will be familiar with a similar such proverb which we have, "Every Bull Has Gold Inside," which is a clever proverb that plays on the words "Toro," meaning bull, and "Oro," which is the word for gold. This is an old farming expression which tells you of the high esteem and importance in which rural communities hold bulls and their regenerative powers, since a good bull is much more valuable to a farmer than a dozen cows. Some people, mostly foreigners, think that the saying is meant to be taken literally, as a reference to the bull's seed, but bull semen is not gold at all, merely a sort of orangey-beige, as any Spanish child can tell you from school trips. The Spanish saying is therefore nothing more than a metaphor.
Here are some of the pics from the album:
Sentiment is from Technique Tuesday...
and can therefore get along fine
Symptoms usually begin with a cold. The person may have a sore, scratchy throat, as well as a fever, runny nose, aches, and fatigue. Difficulty swallowing sometimes occurs, and the patient may have a ticklish cough or wheeze. Most characteristically, the patient suffers voice loss or the voice will sound strained, hoarse, and raspy.
Kneeling on this battle ground
When I am retired
Somebody who’ll want me for my body and not my billfold
I often wish I wasn’t utterly hopeless at advanced Physics and Chemistry, because I have quite a knack for diagnosing myself and others around me. Having read a multi-volume medical health encyclopedia for fun at the age of 10, I’ve always been fascinated by the human body’s many potential failings. I’ve self-diagnosed a few key ailments, correctly diagnosed a few close friends as well. I’m usually everyone’s go-to girl for medical questions now, and I’m always happy to offer my knowledge and intuition up.
Celebrate the repeal today, I will.
“I want to make it clear to the West and to the German people, which is still being blackmailed because of what Nazism did to the Zionists, or to the Jews. I say that what Israel did to the Palestinian people is many times worse than what Nazism did to the Jews, and there is exaggeration, which has become obsolete, regarding the issue of the Holocaust. We do not deny the facts, but we will not give in to extortion by exaggeration. As for the Zionist holocaust against the Palestinian people, and against the peoples of the Arab and Islamic nation – this is a holocaust that is being perpetrated in broad daylight, with the coverage of the media of globalization. Nobody can deny it or claim that it is being exaggerated.”
I'm am so very thankful to the friends who have stood by me through all of my struggles. You all truly are one in a million.
So much to do; so little time.. down into the rabbit hole I go..
Ghost 1: What?
Method: Coloured white card with Brush watercolours to make the red background then emboss it with the Tim Holtz embossing folder. Add the red strips to the main page and then stamp around the page. Cut out and colour the ticket strips with picket fence and faded jeans distress stains. Edge the background card with fired brick distress stain. Stamp the rugby image using faded jeans distress stain and also ink the edge of the tag.
The Republicans however deny that they are making any attempts to block voters for Barack OBama, but instead claim it is necessary to prevent voter fraud. I repeat every expert asked outside of Washington has said that voter fraud is so low as to be non existent in America. 17 States are requiring that everyone have a birth certificate before they will issue them a picture ID. It is just more of the corruption taking place in the Republican Party today.
So go ahead ... tell me what you think. Just don't tell me that my butt looks big.
Jenny Bornholdt
I am all about time saving and doing my regular cooking hour is all I can squeeze into a busy week. I do not want to add another few hours to make freezer meals but I love having them on hand. The easiest way I can fill my freezer without doing alot of extra work is to make more of what I am already making.
Vali Jamal, BA Cambridge, PhD Stanford, ILO economist 1976-2001. Kampala, Uganda. Author: Uganda Asians: Then and Now, Here and There, We Contributed, We Contribute (1250 pp+-, 5.2 kg, $72.50), forthcoming Sep 2012 in three parts. “The book is a national asset in Uganda’s Golden Jubilee year” – HE President Museveni. All related Vali Jamal: http://ismailimail.wordpress.com/tag/vali-jamal/
Even doing this here letter-to-self-to-post-as-a-blog is taking up your time. And I know re-reading that WIP is engaging and lots of fun, but it's not going to go anywhere. I thought we had a deal? One hours reading/work = one hours reading/writing. See how easy it is if you just focus and commit yourself.
I've been collecting highlighters like a crazy woman, and that leads to using them as well (go figure). I've found that I've come to really like a neutral blush and it happens to look quite nice topped with a bit of highlighter. Prim & Proper is a dusty nude shade with just a hint of pink.
I paired this one with the colorful paper & embellishment kit
Vibe: DJ nights/ chilled after work pint Tube: Aldgate East Prices: Entry free, drinks moderate
Happy Tuesday, everyone! As you've probably figured out from my last few posts (or from reading my profile), I am just a tad bit obsessed with Christmas. I have already covered Christmas books, so this edition of Tuesday's Top Ten will be devoted to holiday music, specifically, rock and roll. All of these songs may not be rock, but they are performed by rock stars or rock/pop bands, and play on my CD player all season long. If your favorite rock and roll Christmas songs differ from mine, leave me a comment so I can check them out. Merry Christmas!
She was observed overnight and a nurse was in every 45mins to check on her status....We had a lot of prayer warriors at this point! Her fever disappeared and we were clear to go back home that Friday afternoon!
Now lets compare the wine above with a beer we all love, Stone Double Bastard. BevMo sells a 22 oz bottle of this award winning ale for $6.99. The second bottle is going to cost you, $6.99. That makes the grand total $13.98 for two bottles of Double Bastard. Still worth it to me, but not a good deal compared to the wine.
On the surface, he says shortly before the end of the novel that he experiences a ‘fraternity’ with the universe, since they share a ‘benign indifference’ towards human affairs. Yet such fraternity does not appear to stave off the human, urgent sense of loneliness he feels in his cell, awaiting execution. The baying crowd will permeate that loneliness because they will provide him with ‘attention’, an intense focus on him as an undivided object of their focus, and more – with hatred, that most intense and immediate of emotions. It is, in this sense, a palpable and very human desire.
United boss Sir Alex Ferguson strengthened his squad this summer, after the clubs 3-1 defeat to Barcelona in last seasons Champions League final. The Scot realised that his squad wasn’t strong enough and needed more players.
Well, it all started when it began airing…
Brock has often been described by Bodie as “an essential half of this writing team.” With degrees in both history and education, Brock has, in his role as researcher and story-line consultant, added the vital dimension of historical accuracy. Due to such careful research, The Zion Covenant and The Zion Chronicles series are recognized by the American Library Association, as well as Zionist libraries around the world, as classic historical novels and are used to teach history in college classrooms.
James Cromwell (L.A. Confidential)
Where to rest your wings,
‘There’s one more hero I must name,
It is not beside the point, or off my subject, to notice that these stories and their meanings, have survived because of my family’s continuing connection to its home place. Like my grandfather, my father grew up on that place and served as its caretaker. It has now belonged to my brother for many years, and he in turn has been its caretaker. He and I have lived as neighbors, allies, and friends. Our long conversation has often taken its themes from the two stories I have told, because we have been continually reminded of them by our home neighborhood and topography. If we had not lived there to be reminded and to remember, nobody would have remembered. If either of us had lived elsewhere, both of us would have known less. If both of us, like most of our generation, had moved away, the place with its memories would have been lost to us and we to it—and certainly my thoughts about agriculture, if I had thought of it at all, would have been much more approximate than they have been.
Taking out the Best Glue Ever, I placed two layers of scrap foam from my stash in different areas of the die cut. I realized AFTER taking the picture one piece of foam decided to join another party...it was fixed! LOL!
its theory and potential are fascinating, and this
When we walked in the door after taking Eliza to the pedi this afternoon, Jonah ran to her and burst into tears, saying, "I missed my baby sister!" Even sweeter, Eliza started to smile while in the hospital. My mother swears my siblings and I all did this early as well.
Summer has come to the south already. It’s 84 degrees (and snowing back home), everything is green, the sun is out and the scenery is absolutely breathtaking. It makes me long to get out and hike what are sure to be spectacular trails among the hills rising on both sides of the highways. M would have a stroke and gag me for the rest of the trip if I even suggested such a thing. A little over an hour before he needs to be at the customer gives us just enough time for a pit stop at the rest area outside Statesville. I grab the sleeping bag from the truck, and after getting cold drinks, I spread myself out on the green grass (still marvelling at the green everywhere) and M sits at the picnic table with his book. It’s nice to be away from the truck, if only for a brief time. And when he looks down and smiles at me from his perch on the picnic table...yeah this is the way life is supposed to be lived.
FOB In magazines, the front of the book, where smaller items run
“One can prepare oneself for entering the Abode of the Creator with the help of concrete Divine Teachers — the Holy Spirits. Development in this direction may provide the ability to turn into the ‘Sun of God’ and then — into two or even four ‘Suns of God’. This allows, in particular, completion of the process of Divinization of the matter of the body. But, what is more important, — this provides an opportunity to enter the Abode of the Creator. Because it may be obtained more easily between two ‘Suns of God’.
It’s time for change, it’s time for a new generation
Has anybody else tried this before? Because I will come over and damage your wind chimes for not telling me. (And the neighbors will like me!)
And one crappy picture of the campfire. I didn't get ax-throwing or Hammerschlagen, or pics of all the cute kids playing. Didn't capture the look on Aaron's face as each guest showed up. But, I can say that I think people had a good time!
One of the problems we pilgrims face in “walking the walk”, then, is discerning the Father’s will for us as we go along the way. This we can only do if we ensure if we dedicate ourselves to study and meditate prayerfully on His Word so that the light does not flicker as we go along the path. Accomplishing this in this modern world, where intellectualism reigns, can be quite challenging. That is why I stress the “Inspired” part of the Word of God. For unless the Holy Spirit assists us in letting the Word reach to the depths of our hearts we will be deprived of the fullness of the Light of His Word.
This weekend is the March for Babies. Andrew and I are very excited. My parents and brother and sister in law are walking with us. I bought T-shirts for all of us for "TEAM AIDAN" and so I hope to post pictures after the event. To date we have raised over $2,000 for our team!! I am so amazed and excited. Next year my goal will be $5,000 and I'm going to start fundraising much sooner. I am just so happy that we could do something wonderful like this in Aidan's memory because he has given Andrew and I so much.
It occurred to me recently (probably later than it should have) that my readers since I resumed here, are primarily different than they were a year ago. I've joked on Twitter about how disappointed my internet community would be to discover that I'm not actually as big of an idiot as my persona is, and depending on where you're filtering in from, I may be about to blow your mind.
I say that Worship is my “thing.” It is the area of – might as well say it – theology that most intrigues me. Why do we worship? How do we worship? Whom do we worship? How do I fit into that conversation? How do I follow my calling in the area of worship?
Have a wonderful Monday! Hugs bettina
1. Value: Creating valuable content, directed at your target audience, is key to achieving a successful social media strategy. Less can be more – it is all about quality. Make sure your business has recognised this importance or you could end up becoming uncompetitive or obsolete very quickly. With so much choice given to the huge amounts of traffic available, your content must really capture your customer’s attention and drive them to want more.
We made these projects.. First - a candy heart topiary! As a person who has never liked the taste of these hearts, (disclaimer - I don't eat much candy) I thought this was an excellent use of an extraordinarily cute candy. I saw this when Lyssa linked it from Tiny Prints. I had a bunch of TEENY terra cotta pots that my sister and I had gotten somewhere - they came out to .15 apiece! Of course I bought them years ago and finally felt all smirky about how smart I was today when I got to use them. I used Apple Barrel acrylic paint to paint the pots blue, and I also painted a bamboo food skewer blue. I used a styrofoam ball to hot glue the hearts to, and also to put down into the pot. SO easy and cute!
The music propels the narrative with color and passion, closely following Perrault’s storyline; the tender yearnings of Cinderella, the dissonances experienced with her stepsisters, and the sumptuous waltz with the Prince. This is a fairy tale, but like all fairy tales, it has an undercurrent as it was composed between 1940 and 1944 during the darkest days of World War II. Indeed, at the height of the fantasy, as the clock strikes midnight, we hear the chaos and cacophony of battle, and sobriety returns.
from below
While waiting for my bike to be tuned up, I found a kiosk with this film for extreme sports advertising the GoPro Hero video camera, and it really made me think about being young again. The youth in these films below are pushing the envelope of youthful vitality. It would be totally pointless to wish I could do stuff like this, but I’ve got to ask, what are the activities that I could pursue that would push the limit of my fading vitality?
And, lo and behold, Santa stopped by Tesoros one day at lunch and found the motherlode. More expensive than she thought they might be, but they were the real thing, handpainted in Spain in lurid colors, and the best part? A rubber squeaker in the butthole. The Platonic ideal of what a rubber chicken might be.
Mass non-white immigration can all too easily become self-perpetuating. As the immigrant invasion continues so the notion of what one means by “host society” and “tolerable” changes quite dramatically. Large numbers of immigrants who originate from failed, barbarous, Third-World states (Afghanistan, Pakistan, Somalia and sub-Saharan Africa) and who have acquired British citizenship will not necessarily be sympathetic to the hopes and fears of the white, indigenous population. Why should they be? They want to displace them, the aim of any invader. Armed with the right to vote, these immigrants can exert considerable electoral leverage and secure ever more “tolerant” policies towards their fellow non-whites which for the indigenous white may well be utterly “intolerable”. If the main threat to the racial and cultural stability of Britain both in the short and long term stems from mass non-white immigration, mass white immigration is also a threat. Permitting the influx of hundreds of thousands of immigrants from Bulgaria and Romania, which even by the routine and endemic corruption of Brussels are hopelessly corrupt states, only benefits unscrupulous employers and further strains already malfunctioning public services.
The only problem is that the season as a whole can’t have it both ways. Next story it tries to set up an ambiguity as to whether the Watcher is the Master, but it completely flubs this by having us know what the new Master looks like. You can either sacrifice Tremas to the narrative collapse to rebirth the Master and set up the destabilization of the entire narrative logic of Doctor Who or you can have a mysterious maybe-Master in the next story, but you can’t actually do both.
In other words, planned caesarean section may be preferable not because it is more cost-effective in absolute terms – as seen above, it isn’t – but because it is marginally more expensive but slightly reduces the risk of a specific negative outcome.
The next step was to apply water-based acrylic paints to the figure. The lines would then be retraced one more time, this time with a water-proof Sharpie pen. Finally the last step was to coat the piece with two or three coats of water-based clear varnish to protect the finished product. Depending on how the piece was to be displayed, it would be fitted onto a base or hangers would be attached to its back.
It is perhaps the single best thing we can do to break out of our comfort zones and it is also the most liberating and self empowering. The more we can make a habit of pushing ourselves out of our comfort zone, the easier it becomes.
Far (Live)
Select card games and travel size games
SAT. 9/27 - MERCY & THE MERKETTES @ THE BUCCANEER LOUNGE IN SIERRA MADRE, 9:30pm. 70 W. Sierra Madre Blvd. Full bar, no cover, pool table, free parking. 21 & over. R&B, Funk, Disco, Motown.
Carrot cake with cream cheese frosting used to be une évidence. I couldn't think of enjoying it with a regular buttercream frosting, let alone some kind of whipped cream. No siree, I needed the lightly sweetened tang of a true cream cheese frosting. However, as I got ready to host a pre-Halloween party this year, images of carrot cake and chocolate sour cream frosting started blossoming in my mind. Why not change things up for once? I'll admit another reason was that none of my other desserts had any chocolate in them. And a party without chocolate, well, it's just not a party.
L’s lips sucking me, L’s lips the first time I kissed her, L’s lips biting, testing, feeling how much pain I want.
Honestly, what I see happening is two people losing their jobs before long. She's bat shit crazy and will self destruct eventually and I'm not sure my boss is going to get his act together enough to maintain his job either. I'm sure it's going to be an interesting ride for awhile though and I'm just going to stay on the sidelines and avoid as much of the bloodshed as possible.
Acclaim (£399)
Larry B. Seabrook
We are not side by side on the Stairstepper in our matching sweatbands.
Voidoids (Hell, Quine, Julian, Xavier, Morrison) five demos 1979
Spooky Limericks
Walmart or Target? Lower prices closer to home or nicer, more expensive products with fewer trashy crazies? Depending on my mood, I might fit in with either crew.
he's barking so loudly, there's a man in the hall...
The more I think about things the more I get excited but I know when the time comes for me to move out of my parents house once and for all, it is going to be hard.
Past projects: (Kimi ni Todoke: From Me to You, Ghost in the Shell, Eden of the East)
Under the provisions of KRS 131.081 (11), Kentucky honors federal extensions related to disaster relief for filing of income tax returns, including payment of tax due.
Why not give it an e-reader a try?
The atmosphere is undeniably amicable for such a big scene with a good mix of people. Knowledgeable middle-aged craft beer lovers can be spotted, but here and there are even some young beauties brave enough to try a Skull Splitter (some of them possibly craft beer virgins).
05. New York City Blues
My beautiful niece had her birthday. The kids had a ball, the highlight for the girls was getting their faces painted. Aren't they gorgeous?!
7.Bake for 60- 75 minutes or until the cake is golden brown.
Weissbrau German Bistro & Bar
Every few weeks–even if business is booming–it’s important to step back and assess how your projects are fitting in with your long term goals. If you get too comfortable working with the same clients, it’s easy to fall into a rut and your work can stop developing. Without this focus, you can end up producing work that pays your bills, but you could care less about.
This week is a national holiday here so we have no individual or group therapies. Nothing to do whatsoever at all in the hospital. Nothing. So, I’ll probably be out quite a bit with my sister and the babies. Her husband is working ‘half days’, so I don’t want to intrude too much because they never get to spent time together. We’ll see what happens!
For you “already professional” authors, one of the blogs cited deals with social business on a global scale. If you are planning to take your book products outside of North America, you may glean some tips to speed your process along.
Flecks of speckled light bear witness
Which is why so many teenage girls in the late Seventies
Map (click for larger view)
The agency, which oversees the futures and options market, hasn’t taken any action yet under the expanded power, according to a person familiar with the matter. A CFTC spokesman declined to comment.
Cling-wrap
Lilly Pulitzer Scarf- I have to bring a scarf on a plane whether it is summer or winter. I own several of the Murfee Scarf because they are a great weight and brighten up any outfit. Re-tie it once you are landing and you look instantly freshened.
A few locals sat in the small front bar and despite the initial tumbleweed we got a friendly enough reception. Well we made it out intact after another swift pint, though unlike the Landor I will probably return to the Surprise, even its just to find out what the Surprise is.
The Mauritian government claims it is a humane way of controlling the island’s stray dog population, but it is neither humane nor honest.
the other day evan and i were definitely the easy to spot new parents. we had a moment that totally topped the time we went to penny's pediatrician appointment and forgot her diaper bag. which was of course when she decided to have an epic poop in the car on the way there, forcing us to go to the front desk with our tails between our legs asking for a spare diaper. yeah, that was cake compared to this...
I fear for my country. I hope it wakes up on May 2nd. Unplug from Harper’s matrix, before we’re too far down the rabbit hole to see the light again.
Is it a Governments role to create jobs?
Even Pooja Bhatt seems to have made changes to her plan. “I ain`t letting my secret out. There`s quite a bit of speculation about Sunny Leone and Bipasha being part of the film, but I haven`t finalised the name yet. Hopefully, we`ll be able to make an official announcement soon. But we had a positive meeting with Sunny.”
A few more photos:
I served the hens with steamed asparagus (the first of the season), tri-colored couscous and lots of memories.
The following link leads to an article about the News of the World hacking scandal and the fact that the mobile telephone number or Robert Thomson was sold to journalists at the time that he was first in protective custody: http://hackinginquiry.org/comment/if-a-bulger-killer-was-hacked-how-did-mulcaire-get-his-top-secret-number/
with words and wondrous tongue so wickedly.
Then I went up to talk to "Robin".
Jambalaya - Pluto Shervington (Hank Williams/ The Carpenters)
The Stampman have some new releases imminent and are giving sneak peeks on their blog. I've seen them in their entirity and ooooooooh what a treat!
fabric scraps
Now what to look for in an Advisory Board and What are the roles in a Board of Directors. Get ready because there is money involved on both ends.
11:30am-12:30pm
The movie theater is a place the takes your imagination soaring. A place where your dreams come true. Where you can be scared, thrilled, or even in love. This is a special place to go and experience feelings that you might not otherwise have.
I can't wait to hear what this might sound like. Bun E. Carlos is one of my favorite mellow ass drummers. I remember seeing Cheap Trick many years back and he was just smoke and whirling drum interludes...though he never seemed to move.
As the pressure on ECB grows to step up its “bid of last resort” for European sovereign bonds, the folks over at Zero Hedge ask the very important question what are consequences if the ‘zone resorts to massive debt monetization? Here is one plausible scenario we’re looking at.
He said this during an exclusive interview with the New Straits Times at his office here.
A company filled with self-starting, responsible individuals – what a concept. Wow, just wow.
I've also been hard at play with digital images again, and have two 3x4 journaling cards below for you to use. I really like the idea of the ledger paper inside the doily on the second one - what do you think?
Frances Gibb reported in The Times today that fortune tellers and astrologists will be bracketed with double glazing salesmen and will have to act fairly towards consumers. Fortune tellers et al will have to tell customers that what they offer “Is for entertainment only” and not “experimentally proven”. Faith healers, spirtualists and mediums are also caught by this legislation.
Benefits the Christmas Toy Fund
“Volcanic activity over the past two-three years has significantly altered the contour of the volcano, with the crater increasing in size by 50% and the slopes becoming far steeper.” RiaNovosti reported.
Who: Cathy and Ang
“The RSPCA is a TERRIBLE organisation. A glorified pet shop. And they’d rather KILL animals than keep them. The RSPCA! Ha!”
Elliot said it would be unwise to call big meetings, because the SB would suspect that the Liberal Party was reviving. So Mbele said no, he would discuss it with people in small groups, over tea, and read it out and see what could be done. We explained about the “Obedience to God” groups in Johannesburg, and suggested that they might start similar groups here. Mbele was so keen to go out delivering that we felt if we hadn’t been there, he would be off on his bicycle already. So we took a couple of photographs, and saw a couple of his friends, and left.
This article explains the problem kids face when presssured by older or more “popular” teens. This was one of my first stories that used quotes and statistics from other sources and websites.
Being creative is the best way to improve the winter blues.
The country’s women and girls continue to live with insecurity despite efforts to curb violence against women, specifically sexual violence, which has been on the rise. Several studies indicate that the failure of the criminal justice system to investigate and punish sexual violence has created a culture of impunity for rape. The rulings of magistrates and judges sometimes trivialize the gravity of rape. Judge Mogoeng Mogoeng’s nomination and subsequent appointment as chief justice by President Jacob Zuma could erode the gains that have been made in addressing violence against women. Many civil society groups have accused Mogoeng of undermining the rights of women and girls by issuing lenient sentences in cases of rape and domestic violence, and invoking in his rulings myths about rape that often blame the victims and excuse perpetrators.
Sometimes I think I’m lucky I make it out of there alive every week.
They have 3 kinds of cream puffs – one with a hard shell and a custard filling, the middle one has a softer choux pastry and a mixture of custard and fresh cream, and the bottom one is meant to be ripped and dipped.
I've been thinking a lot about this subject lately. When I created this blog, I made a conscious decision to attach my name, my REAL name, to it knowing I would only be publishing articles I would be comfortable letting the whole world read. In part it was to gain exposure to my own work, in part to participate in an ever growing scholarly community that exists exclusively online. But I never had any grand illusions that my blog would get me a job, tenure, or increase my chances of publishing in an academic journal.
Absolutely genius. Action packed, thought-provoking, touching.
Christmas shopping is a funny topic in April, but as I was thinking about firsts with lupus, I realized that my first rolling shopping mall trip was one of my most memorable lupus firsts. Many years ago, when Christmas was approaching, I had to face the fact that shopping and the mall had been my absolute last priority, as I struggled through an intense long-lasting arthritis flare of my lupus. Walking was extremely difficult because of swollen and painful feet, knees and ankles, along with overwhelming bone-tired fatigue. Because my husband had never done the Christmas shopping alone without me, he devised a plan to accommodate my severely narrowed physical abilities and endurance.
But as Trish Hennessy highlighted yesterday, government spending actually translates into major benefits for taxpayers. Median households earning $66 000 annually receive $41 000 in public services. That’s what I would call getting a bang for your buck.
That’s it for the basics. Later sports fans.
If you need any other tips of more information, feel free to send us an email.
Censored under the National Content Regulations?
It was time for something completely different: so we had a hot dog roast. Then we watched one of our favorite movies, The Sound of Music. Dad loved Eidelweiss.
An illustration subsequently mentioned being the ADA whom, whenever asked for their recommendations, state they make little certain diet recommendations however, in fact, do suggest a high carbohydrate diet while giving grudging help for a lower carbohydrate diet.Speaking at the symposium, Dr. Feinman, professor of biochemistry at Downstate Medical Center (SUNY) in Brand-new York, some sort of advocate as well as research scientist regarding the topic, whose work and additionally conclusions I have stated on my own blog and elsewhere just lately, stated which official associations had been not willing to fully accept the available encouraging information and additionally which scientists engaged inside the field were underrepresented upon panels determining diabetes and nutritional plans.
Dolce has a cotton candy pink base with dark pink shimmer and multiple sizes of white, holo purple & silver hex and bar glitter. Also, holo silver half moons are in the mix.
inner strength is willingly giving to me, as she accepts me as her protecting shield
5.) Finally, my stepdad became my official dad....he adopted me.
Boom! Finding out your teenage daughter is pregnant
i surprised my dad with tickets to the earth, wind, and fire concert when we returned home from California. we spent a week there to clean out my grandma's house and have her funeral service. it was a rough week, but i'm glad we were all together during that time. i loved finding old pictures of my dad and photo albums of my great grandparent's wedding.
“All of these factors will strongly reinforce the vitality of the new retail corridor. Studies have previously concluded that island residents spend $0.86 of every retail dollar off-island, and we are committed to changing that dynamic,” said Kimberly Sherman-Stamler, Vice President of Related Companies. UPDATE 11:20 AM - The new retail stores and improvements on Main Street would not have been accomplished without the persistence and hard work of former RIOC Director Jonathan Kalkin who first proposed the idea of a private sector Main Street Retail Master Leaseholder way back in 2007. Mr. Kalkin should be thanked for his role in helping to bring about these new stores.
Murderous cop denied parole
Commander, U.S. Air Force Space Command (’02-‘06)
We have ten kegs and two firkins of Whiskey Barrel Commercial Suicide set for release.
How to Get Rid of Pimples Overnight
However, I did not hesitate one moment when buying “De Bello Lemures – or the Roman War against the Zombies of Armorica” written by Lucius Artorius Castus and translated and edited (wink!) by Thomas Brookside. I had made up my mind to buy it even before I read the fragment available online. I was sold on by the title, by the fantastic cover (when in Rome, I have put my hand inside that mouth – la Bocca della Verità, the Mouth of Truth – and it didn’t bite my hand!) and by the idea.
Despite the hot weather yesterday, families were seen cleaning tombstones, burning paper replicas of various items and offering food to their ancestors.
Wynkoop Brewing Company Two Guns Pilsner
It's 2.30, time we were heading off to the barbeque - I'm a long way from the Camden Town of yesterday but I still feel almost as out of place ...
Innocence lost, that happens over a period of time.
So, they call it the Dipsea foot-race, and starting in Mill Valley the route goes directly over the shoulder of my beloved Mount Tamalpais and down along Steep Ravine and Webb Creek. In June Webb Creek isn't quite as spectacular, but imagine a foot-race along the Redwood studded beauty of this area.
Joy Division Love will tear us apart UK
This is the second in a series of YA books about Whit and Whisty Allgood, teen witches on the run from a brutal, bald dictator and his totalitarian regime, which bans books, music and magic. I know James Patterson is a popular author because I see his books coming in and out of work all the time, but I've never really been tempted by any of them 'till I saw this series. So far they've been really fact paced, the characters are great and I'm enjoying finding references to adult sci-fi/post apocalyptic books I've read (they go to the Brave New World centre for 're-education'...they even live in a shopping mall like in the TV series The Tribe!)
In short, it’s a letter from a supreme cynic, who has every reason to know better but appears to refuse to think.
If you've been living under a rock the past couple of days, all three NYRR races are canceled this weekend. The next NYRR/Marathon qualifying run is Sept. 17 - the Fitness 4-miler, though entries are limited.
Third, cross talk. Interrupting. Advice and opinions. Too much information. So you are 50 years old, a successful real estate investor, and still smoke pot every week end. What's your point in boasting about that?
Do they really think the public is that stupid?
The most interesting aspect of this report for RADNET is the continual references to the Los Alamos National Laboratory as that location playing the greatest role in the production of nuclear warheads once the plutonium used in these warheads was fabricated at the government reactors in Hanford, WA, Savannah River Plant in South Carolina, and at the Rocky Flats Colorado facility. For more information about Los Alamos as a source point of anthropogenic radioactivity see the citations under Los Alamos in this section of RADNET under Los Alamos National Laboratory.
3. Guess approximate length of curtain pole I will need.
I’m not ready to talk about it. I know, I know. How can I do that after the above statement? I have to explain something. But…I just can’t. I’ve only finished crying, and the threat of a new round of tears busting out of these eyeballs is all too close. It doesn’t help that I’m watching passionate Latin dances on Dancing With The Stars at the same time.
However, the primary medical cause of laryngitis is a viral infection. The same viruses that cause the majority of simple colds are responsible for laryngitis. In extremely rare cases, more harmful bacteria or the bacteria that causes tuberculosis (TB) may cause laryngitis. In people with faulty immune systems (like AIDS patients), infections with fungi may be responsible for laryngitis.
Note also that FDR was the Assistant Secretary of the Navy from 1913-1920 – he resigned to run and lose a bid for Vice Presidency but his resignation was also overshadowed by his involvement in the Newport sex scandal. Nevertheless, he still went on to become President. Seems amazing that these scandals did not stop his political career.
This information is for you yourself to consider. How you use it, view it, accept or reject it is not my concern. I share this information, because I want to, period.
5. I love black & white photography. If I had it my way, all my photos would be black and white. It’s not that I don’t like color, it’s just b&w is more appealing to me (must be the contrast).
this guy is also sho shweet.
breathless anticipation as the Ecstasy starts to come on
It has been almost 12 weeks since my hysterectomy, & I am improving by leaps & bounds post-op. The first 6-8 weeks were very tiring, my stamina was non-existent. Around week 9, I noticed I had a bit more pep in my step - finally, the anemia was going away & my energy level was increasing! Praise God! I still get tired about once a week, & either lay down for a few hours to read, or take a nice long nap. But the rest of the days, I find that I can keep going with only short breaks for a glass of iced tea, or to work on my crocheting for 15 minutes or so. That is such a huge difference compared to the last few years, I cannot even explain how my life has changed from the surgery. I know that it was a drastic step to take, & it was one that I thought about for 3 years before taking it... but I am so grateful that it has improved the quality of my life. I'm still not 100% healed, but even being on the mend is better than before.
Mr Waterson said, 'This man's presence in Eastbourne raises a number of serious issues that ministers must answer.
He and a buddy redid this old (oldest building in G-town) business and turned it into a shake-makin' club complete with workout facility in the back. It's been fun to watch. Right now they serve breakfast and lunch and have about 20-30 people that come each day for one of those meals. They've only been open for a month so it's growing rather quickly. So exciting to see!
I love these old signs!
When Lt. Col. Daniel L. Davis spoke about his assignment for the Army’s Rapid Equipping Force which resulted in a meticulous and well-documented report from the battlefields, contrary to the official “success” claims of the generals, he provided fresh material and a sensitive mind ready to elaborate on any questions by the press.
About their similarities and the prospect of becoming a pair
But here is a card I made for a friend at work using the flowers. I really like the layers; it adds color and dimension. Next project is to create a spring card. Now just have to choose which one to use! Fun ideas..
Also, with the benefit of hindsight, I'm not sure that all of my entries would perhaps have been on a par with 'ol Pepys. Although riveting, I can see now that a book documenting that "mum bought 2 subbuteo floodlights", "I went to Southend, I got Roy of the Rovers" and "Arsenal won 3-1- yesterday" may not have set the literary world on fire.
3. Add softened cream cheese, Parmesan, sage, thyme, onion powder, salt and pepper to the bowl. Mix well.
“Oh it was my pleasure” the receptionist said, with one more look at Trent before he walked off with Geoff, waving goodbye to her.
Star Trek: The Motion Picture was a financial success, but a critical failure. the general assumption is TWoK was greenlit as a way of cheaply milking the franchise before the public’s interest waned. Paramount decide to get rid of the biggest problem from the first film--Gene Roddenberry--and put up a minimal amount of financing in order to do so.
In The Good Old Summertime (1949) ... TCM ... 4 PM
All the doubts and fears started creeping in: "It's too expensive." "What if I can't get any clients?" "There's no market for that kind of thing here." And so and so forth. I defaulted to the same script that's been running in my head my whole life: "I can't ______ because ______"
Why did you choose to shoot in Glasgow?
Each set of stickers includes 12 stickers - 1 for each month of their first year, plus a Just Born sticker!
To make the chocolate mousse, simply melt the chocolate chips in a double boiler (a metal pot or bowl sitting atop a pot of water over medium heat). Stir the chips until they are just melted and silky. Let the melted chocolate cool a bit and then add it to the whipped cream. Fold it in gently so the whipped cream stays light. Spoon the mixture into serving glasses and refrigerate for at least an hour or until it sets up. Top with whipped cream, chocolate chips or your other favorite toppings. Enjoy!
Exceptions would be granted for abuse and cruelty (which is sure to lead to a spike in false claims of domestic violence). Married couples without children wouldn't be affected because marriage is really all about the children, dear. And there's nothing better for kids than one parent wanting out of a marriage while the other parent won't grant a divorce.
I had initially thought that this challenge would be easy, 26 miles, no problems! I thought I was pretty fit. WRONG!!!! Although I participate in a Jive dance classs every week and was when I started out jogging a couple of times a week (a miles or so), walking (power walking) is different.
“One Day At A Time”
I first messed around with some old fleece, adjusting there, cutting there and then held my breath while I cut into the good fabric. Now...ta da. Now if I could just get my son to look at the camera.... :)
Fortunately, while the rest of us carry on with our everyday lives oblivious to the hardship and danger endured by our fellow citizens in harm's way, they continue to persevere and stand between us and the barbarians. Lance Corporal Dimitrios Gavriel joined the Marine Corps after 9/11. For me he epitomizes the spirit of his ancestors. He lived a life of noble ideals and devotion to duty. The son of Greek immigrants, a champion high school wrestler and Brown University graduate, he walked away from a lucrative career on Wall Street to avenge friends killed in the collapse of the Twin Towers. Dimitrios volunteered to serve as an enlisted man, turning down a commission as an officer. He also volunteered to be a "grunt", an infantryman. He was wounded during the vicious fighting in the Battle of Fallujah. Undeterred by his wounds he returned to his unit and was subsequently killed in an explosion a few days later. In the words of his father: "he put his life on the line when most of us would have run away. We lost a great kid. If his life can inspire other young men to follow suit, to believe in their ideals, to recognize there is more to life than getting a job, than making a living, I think out society can be better off. That's the legacy he leaves, and that's the legacy I strongly suggest he lived by."
I am planning to enter a few challenges. If I remember to upload this to all of them. You know how that goes with me. Bwaaahahahaha!
Zefferelli's Romeo and Juliet
This morning JoAnn was taking a dip in her own little elf bubble bath made of cotton balls. I’ve seen pictures of entire sinks filled with cotton balls, but I only had about 10 cotton balls left, so I improvised. Either way, Anna missed it because she was in a really bad mood this morning and didn’t care. At least I have a photo!
Hi everyone! Since Easter is this coming Sunday, thought I'd share with you my card for the occasion.
Gethsemane some years ago. A man of mature faith and strong intellect, “Jeff”
With the WiiU and 3DS Nintendo is trying to reestablish its core software buying user base. Nintendo wants to retain its casual hardware buying market demographic but regain its lost core demographic.
A few more details about this piece:
"Designed by Thomas Gaskin. Creative direction by Hugh Dubberly. Algorithms by Patrick Kessler. Patent belongs to William Drenttel + Jessica Helfand.
2-3 tbsp butter or clarified butter
If we are without a mask to hide behind, then what is lost, and what is gained?
Oh and we ended up with the most Gold medals in the Winter Olympics, pretty good even if we are 3rd place in medal counts.
So, I'm guessing if Tempus Fugit, then Carpe Diem...
The ostrich? Well, an Italian-American called Ping Bodie once won a pasta-eating contest against an ostrich called Percy. Percy fainted after the 11th plate of spaghetti. The ethnicity of the participants was a topic for discussion as the (very fine) illustrator had drawn Ping using chopsticks, probably misled by that very Chinese-sounding name. But, no - Ping was a professional basketball player, as Italian-American as they come.
The experience galvanized Megan’s commitment to help other women by guiding them through an appropriate fitness regime before, during and after pregnancy. “I am excited to use my knowledge and personal experience to help others, especially moms-to-be, to maintain a fit and healthy lifestyle and to enjoy it at the same time!”
PART – B
2010.08.07 Iraq Garma 3 15 al-Qaeda militants detonate a bomb outside a home, killing three residents.
What if he's a fit, frisky ladies man who wears loud Hawaiian shirts and likes to do a little soft-shoe shuffle? What if his shop sells collectable movie posters, 50's and 60's kitsch and novelty items?
Cut off from personal family, at times under the care of sadistic individuals and without access to books or television from the outside world, imagination became a survival mechanism. As a young teenager, I secretly entertained commune children with fantastic stories that took us through time and space, until these sins were discovered by cult leaders. Several laboriously hand-written books were confiscated and burned and I was ordered on pain of--well, a whole lot of pain--never to write again.
He paid nursery and school fees, medical expenses and the mum’s £3,000 credit card debt. 'There were times when he struggled to pay. He had to work long hours to make ends meet,' Mr Lloyd Jones explained.
1. Anxiety and Stress
We walked in and a boy said, "Hi Savannah!" A BOY said hi to my little girl!
I've been waiting for Whit Stillman's new movie Damsels In Distress for a long time and I finally saw it this past weekend. I had mixed feelings about it. I was excited that one of my favorite directors had ended his 15 year hiatus to make a film AND that said film was about preppy, Northeastern liberal art school campus life (oh golly!) Though, I was disappointed with its grating, often ridiculous plot points (the frat boys don't know the colors?) All of the characters besides Violet (portrayed by Greta Gerwig) are flat and annoying. The main character herself, Lily (unfortunately played by a breathy, overly childlike Analeigh Tipton), isn't even funny. Not even accidentally so. It seems all of the hilarious satire was given to Violet, which is a shame seeing as how Stillman has delivered awesome ensemble cast movies where every single character shines in their own disillusioned sense of pretension. I want more clueless intellectuals! Is that too much to ask for? Or, maybe I really just wanted Chris Eigeman to be in the movie.
No Safe Place by Richard North Patterson - Audio Tapes
The camper has been alright so far, not too big, not too small. Oakley has been unbelievably happy right from the get go, so that has been awesome!!! And yes, Dad, I have cooked great meals already, no hot dogs as of yet!!!
I have attempted to have the boy's hair cut on a couple of occasions and the only successful (if you can call it that) endeavor was when my mom and sister took him and held him down while he was buzzed. The other times, we literally had to leave without his hair being cut.
The blog’s purpose is for me to write about writing. To keep me writing. When I’m writing, I’m happier. I learned this only recently.
Helen Mirren, The Last Station
Ruben D. Correa, 44, New York, N.Y.
Have you heard of BIG FOX? It is a strategy to help students read nonfiction. The BIG part is for before they read and the FOX part is for after they read. I stumbled upon this recently (I can't remember exactly where, if it was your blog-thanks!) and then on Wednesday when I received my class's newest Scholastic News I saw that they were also highlighting this strategy. So on to the strategy:
Walk the path to good health by taking the proper care of your body and it will run as smoothly as any other fine-tuned machine. But you must make sure you fill it with the proper fuel and service it on a regular basis. The proper fuel consist of a daily consumption of healthy food and nutrients.
October 1 @ Empty Bottle (Chicago, Illinois)
1 tbs coarsely chopped fresh coriander
in safe Unknowing, soon we Knowing find.
Figuring out which type of shoe is right for you is step 1, but having the proper support for your unique gait is important as well. While you can do some research on your own to figure out which type of arch and pronation you have, I recommend getting an analysis from a specialist. This is a free service that many running stores carry in which a qualified staff member will evaluate you both visually and electronically to figure out what type of support and correction you will need. Below is a list of some of the places where you can get evaluated. Happy shoe shopping!
…the failure of austerity policies to deliver as promised has long been obvious. Yet European leaders spent years in denial, insisting that their policies would start working any day now, and celebrating supposed triumphs on the flimsiest of evidence.
Nor did she write in her book about last spring’s extensive study from the Center for American Progress showing that “undocumented immigrants don’t simply ‘fill’ jobs; they create jobs. Through the work they perform, the money they spend, and the taxes they pay, undocumented immigrants sustain the jobs of many other workers in the U.S. economy, immigrants and native-born alike.” Were undocumented immigrants to “suddenly vanish” from SB 1070’s “attrition through enforcement,” the study estimated that Arizona’s economy would shrink by $48.8 billion–like that in Alabama.
Good afternoon!
The first issue was allowing children to select their own family names. Kids will most likely choose their own name as the leader of the trail, but their family will not be so lucky. Some names may include: Farts Magee, Poop, Hershey Squirts, Boobs, and many other juvenile obsessions. Other than the names, the game really was more of a social observation on how cruel and unfiltered children are. Sure, some nerd somewhere probably played it correctly, but what was the fun in that?
So general story. Loki was helped by a mysterious alien entity who gave him a scepter of power and an entire army. All he has to do is return the Cube of power we saw in Captain America, the Tesseract. It has unlimited energy and power within it, although it’s unstable and no one knows much about what it does. They’ve been studying it, but the movie starts right off with Loki returning to Earth, basically wrecking the SHIELD base which holds the Tesseract, and taking it right from their hands. He also takes the scientist working on it Erik Selvig, who was introduced in Thor, and Clint Barton AKA Hawkeye. The scepter has mind control abilities. He needs the Tesseract to open a portal to where his army is waiting, but he has to accomplish several things first. When Nick Fury sees how dangerous this situation is, he decides to call in the Avengers. The team was suspended as a lost project, but he insists to the council of backers that they at least need an immediate response team. We see the team assemble fairly quickly: Natasha Romanoff AKA Black Widow is called in once she hears Hawkeye is compromised, she grabs Bruce Banner AKA Hulk who has been off the radar for a long time, Steve Rogers AKA Captain America has been adjusting poorly to his new time, and Tony Stark AKA Iron Man is there to consult and help out. Stark has just unveiled his big project, Stark Tower, which is using a giant arc reactor to power it solely on that. They all show up on the Helicarrier, a famous SHIELD air base.
Here is a photo of our daughter Girly~Twirly and her boyfriend when they came home on their Spring Break this year. I know that I made the Italian Skillet Bread when they were home...but I guess, I didn't take any photos of any of our meals together!
My son is in a new school this year (he was home schooled before) and the big challenge now is to find friends. He has no friends yet and I just feel so sorry for him. I still remember my elementary school years, where I was mobbed for being fatter as all the other children. I'm praying, that God would have grace on him and give him at least ONE friend in the coming weeks.
On Ellen’s comment on her Web site that that “marijuana enforcement will be a low priority”: Ellen says she will make marijuana enforcement a low priority. She is making a campaign promise not to enforce Oregon’s marijuana laws and that is appalling — especially when you’re running to be attorney general, the state’s top law enforcement officer.
So our very own Jade Ashton Scully has been busy! Check out these amazing photos of a concept shoot she organised with makeup artist, Marieke Sixx and photographer, Mads Norgaard.
For the foregoing reasons, the claim language at issue recites sufficient structure on its face for performing the claimed functions, and therefore, contrary to the district court’s interpretation, does not involve a means-plus-function limitation.
Too many expectations spoil the relationship
Come lightening, flash! Come, thunder, crash!
Love Clairebears x
Now excuse me while I go punch a wall.
"All I had to do today was buy sneakers and I didn't even have to do it and I didn't even do it." - Dave Horwitz
I turned my attention after that to cleaning and finishing touches in our home.
This was an interesting and unusual novel covering several strands: the narrator’s research into Daphne du Maurier’s work; Daphne du Maurier researching the Brontes in order to write a biography of Branwell Bronte; and Symington, the disgraced Bronte expert. I found it interesting how the author interwove fictional fact with the narrator’s own story, showing similarities between all the characters of her novel. It has encouraged me to reread my collection of du Maurier novels, and to look at Branwell Bronte in a new light. I would recommend this book as a well-written, gripping and unusual novel.
I woke up today and my heart literally, physically hurt.
The background papers are made by embossing white-core papers and sanding them to reveal the pattern (I used a Tim Holtz folder).
The most sacred bond in a woman’s life should be the bond with her mother – but in this novel, it is the older women, the mothers, aunts, grandmothers that keep younger women in line. It is the older women that ensure that younger women are so weighed down by the expectations of tradition and culture that they are not allowed to express their true selves. The main character has to change her first name in order to be considered a good match for the rich, handsome single young man!
I’ve tried doing things.
Okay, so here is the remix done by 4FRNT. I’ll also include the original below the remix. ENJOY!
Did you notice the killer death grip she had on that bag of chips? She carried that bag around for the whole 1 1/2 hours we were there. To quote Joey from Friends, "Ellie doesn't share food!"
Austinites will benefit from this surge of beer culture with public events at local venues featuring special beers on tap, craft beer-paired dinners and good elbow-rubbing time with the royalty of craft brewers. “Austin is a city rich in craft beer culture and we look forward to bringing the industry together in such a beer-friendly town,” said Cindy Jones, Marketing Director for the Brewers Association.
R1: Ch 2, 6 sc in second ch from hook.
and realized Rick Santorum is crazy
So my 'retirement' plan has now gone from "dying while I can still afford the high quality dog food" to "hoping not to have to sell a kidney to pay the rent before I'm 60."
Phil Jones and Chris Smalling could both step in, while Ferguson may also opt to reinforce his midfield with either Ryan Giggs, Tom Cleverley or Park Ji-sung at the expense of a wide player or Danny Welbeck.
The fact was that my students were getting the standard of lecture Alan would have given to any audience in any place anywhere in the world where he could safely assume that his listeners were intelligent, but not necessarily well informed. I did not care that there were people in my class not up to it. The best of my students were getting an experience they could expect to have in a lecture hall at Cambridge or Oxford, and that was what really mattered.
Category 2~Any EvaDress pattern garment project you started some time ago and have been meaning to finish. It doesn't matter if it has been years (hey, it happens) or weeks, when you submit in this category you need to tell us why you didn't finish it until now.
Mom-mom Mary & Pop-pop Roy (on left) shortly after they were first married
Business owners say that they need a forecasting horizon of about five years in order to know what to do with their business plans. Under Obama, they’re not getting five months, let alone five years.
Many zoologists would also make the point – often very strenuously, whilst backing away out of range – that it is very unwise to attempt a three-point-turn will a gorilla, especially the dominant silverback.
About 4 hours, and an hour of pushing, out popped Gavin. Looked just like his Daddy! We were so happy he arrived. We did not know what we were having, but my Mom (who could not wait) found out what he was before he was born…of course my family had a blast teasing me before he came!!
What you need to know for the challenge:
Submitted by Jean Bedell-Mashkikinabinais
‘It would have interfered with my work,’ he told Philip. ‘What work?’ asked Philip brutally. ‘My inner life,’ he answered.
3. The end of the Mayan calendar means absolutely nothing. This is the believe of the ignorant and the apathetic. The fact that the Mayan calendar means at least a new age is clear. Reaching the end of the 5126 Mayan calendar is an enormous event in the history of mankind and should be celebrated.
Second, my writing time is very connected to my prayer time. I have been cheating myself of my time with God. It is during this time that I speak to Him and He speaks to me. My relationship is beyond “hello” or a “to do list” I give for Him to accomplish. It is my time to be in His presence and listen. I find when I am quiet and listen, He speaks. And He speaks very clearly.
After Elizabeth was 2 weeks old and in the hospital, and we got the call from my SIL that she had breast cancer, followed swiftly 2 weeks later by my aunt's death, I told David that I think this was going to be our Annus Horribilis. Bad Luck Year.
Last Sunday I woke up to find that this blog, Dollycas's Thoughts had been disabled by Google, along with all my other Google Accounts. Not knowing if or when I would have access again, I started over at Wordpress. First the free version and then the updated version. It is still a Work In Progress but I invite you all to come check it out.
Next one from China Glaze Spring collection will be ELECTROPOP Lights & Brights!
(6) Kid's Cuisine TV dinners
And I also was still in the somewhat new “dating” phase with my soon to be wife and needed to remain cool and un-sweaty.
The message itself is on shaky ground, that an accident doesn't count as an accident if there were a possibility it could have been avoided. While it's true that no accidents would ever occur if everyone sat very still in darkened, heavily carpeted rooms until softly and gently toppling from dehydration, I can't help but think that it would be devastating to the economy. And would it help ease the mind of our perky young burn victim to stand over her hospital bed and sneer, "You did that on purpose. Dumb broad." Doubtful.
On The Road by Jack Kerouac: Of course you guys saw this one coming. This novel is a bit different from the rest of the list. I've been reading this novel for the past three or four years now. While I still haven't finished the novel, it ranks up there with my top ten because I relate to Jack. I love his experience with humanity, his lyrically spontaneous prose, his musings on living life with passion and drive (though, I obviously don't condone most of the shenanigans he gets into with his friends). His writing will move me to read anything he's written, simply because of it's sincerity, risk, and love of the craft.
I adored these books. They sparked off an appetite for knowledge and words that has never died down. I did ok at school, but that sort of structured learning never really grabbed me. But it had its moments. My English teacher was a crazy man. Mr Amos was a wild haired sullen man, most of the time. But every now and then someone would anger him and he'd fly into a rage. I can't blame him really, there was quite a lot of provocation. But he was also inspiring, blazing enthusiastically about this or that book. Reading portions of it to us. He read a short story to us, Ray Bradbury's The Fruit At The Bottom Of The Bowl. It was astonishing to me, full of invention and drama, with a real tension to it. That was probably over thirty years ago.
The road they are on is long and perilous—and in a world where young women only live to age twenty and men die at age twenty-five, time is precious. In this sequel to Lauren DeStefano’s harrowing Wither, Rhine must decide if freedom is worth the price—now that she has more to lose than ever.
Cornish Rock chickens are meat chickens. They are a cross between a Cornish strain rooster and a white Plymouth Rock hen. The Cornish strain is a double breasted breed. The Plymouth Rock is tall and large boned. These broiler chickens have a high food conversion ratio. They grow quickly and are ready for harvesting at about seven to nine weeks of age.
Nature is not a commodity: The path to Rio+20
-1/3 cup butter, softened
In India in 1824 British government for the first time enacted regulation I of 1824(for land acquisition).its application was throughout the whole of the Bengal provinces immediately subject to the presidency of fort William.
Your flowing strength
My mother married a city boy and ended up leading a relatively city life. In a way, it was like they compromised, as our store and apartment were placed on a full acre of land. We did have opportunities to visit aunts, uncles and cousins who were continuing somewhat of a farming life. I have fond memories of being dragged around on an ancient pony named Captain and sitting on Uncle Paul's lap steering the tractor. Weddings were complete with square dancing. I think I was the only one of my friends growing up who had any idea how to do it.
LOL, I'm the same age as Austin (my birthday is actually just a couple of days before his) and I've been reading and laughing at your blog for about a year now. What do you think of that?
Under Labour, health spending in England tripled to reach more than £100 billion a year. A new “NHS Constitution” set out the service’s commitment to human rights, high-quality care and respect for patients and their families.
I may have mentioned wayyy back in 2010 that my mom and I were hosting my sister's Bridal Shower a few months before here Miami Beach Destination Wedding. Well, here I am, almost a year later, FINALLY posting pictures. Oh well, better late than never!
1 exits
Puff of smoke
I am part of undone and so, now, are you. It’s time the youth stand up through sharing their words whether it is in a coffee house, a tweet or through this blog. We all have a voice that has a powerful pile of words building up behind our stapled lips.
I begun to search the City for quiet cafe’s that offer free wi-fi connection, located two; Mama’s in the Excelsior district on Mission Street and; Cinqe Terre on Van Ness near Pine. Both are old style coffee houses, slightly run down and thankfully lacking the insistent Bohemianism of similar places or the efficient spanking industrialism of SB and its wannabes. Mama’s claims some connection to the arts and three or for evenings a month offers poetry readings and the like, while during the day it caters to a few latino locals who periodically drop in. Cinqe Terre, on the other hand, is owned by an Italian immigrant and offers a number of vaguely italian sandwiches and a few deserts imported from Italy.
Joe arrived quite soon, and took us outside while Steve and I had a smoke (out of deference to Levon's health problems), and Joe reiterated to us the importance of this project. "I mean, when you talk to Levon," he said, "you have to realize that this guy has been there at every stage of rock n' roll history. He saw Elvis perform, and Roy Orbison, and John Lee Hooker. He was there with Ronnie Hawkins, Dylan, and there at Woodstock. And then the stuff with The Band. The Last Waltz. And here he still is, about to launch a comeback. I mean, this is a big deal."
So I don’t feel depressed anymore, but it got me wondering if there is something deeper going on, because why am I calling myself an asshole?
There’s a rocker chick, or the remains of one, buried inside me. I hope “buried” is the wrong word. I hope she’s not dead. I haven’t been listening to her or paying much attention to her lately which is too bad because she’s a lot more important to me than my inner child. She’s someone aspirational.
Hey Maria
Owen Dudley Edwards told the audience they could direct their questions to one or more of the candidates specifically, but that all of the panel could give an answer if they wished: any non-directed question would go to the whole panel, and he would direct the order of replies.
The gift of penance being one of the fruits of this Sacrifice, sin ought not to hinder us from approaching, but rather should be a motive for our coming to it. For would it be just to hinder the sick from using remedies, or keep the dead from the source of life? It is by this Sacrifice that we obtain the grace of penance; and if sinners return from it as they come, without the least change, it is not because the blood of Jesus Christ did not cry for mercy in their favour, but because they rejected it.
Realizing the blood is coming out from the rips,
VA
This proportion (0.05 per cent) of alcohol is allowed to be added only when there is a medical treatment case, he said. Source
Then the dance began, and while I danced with some people I knew from the dances after my classes, many of them were people I had never met before. One of the former I recognized after I started dancing with her for a few minutes, as she kept trying to hold on to as little of my left fingers as possible. Since this is the hand that does most of the spins and communicates most of the moves in swing, I kept trying to hold on to more. For some reason, she was fine with my right hand, which was grabbing her left hand the same way that my left hand was grabbing her right. Luckily, the other people I danced with were more pleasant experiences, minus one, which I will detail in a little bit.
Woman is a nurturing harlot.
Today, my daughter, Catelynn and I decided to see what we could do with felt. I have always loved felt because it sticks together easily and doesn't require glue or anything....it's a relatively clean activity! That's my favorite kind of activity since I'm not a huge fan of messy projects. (No really, I'm seriously bad with painting and glue/glitter projects, my instincts are to say "no way" when my children ask me if they can use glue or paint! Oh, and don't get me started on moon sand or the like...GAH, I HATE that stuff!)
34. Atonement - Ian McEwan
I actually sewed something. Yep, that is right. I was able to sit down and sew something.
Guitar - Johannes Krämer
-‘Memba that haircut I mentioned he needed to tame his expanding mullet? Yeah, well that trip went really bad. He screamed and cried the entire time. I’ve since had to work on his noggin’ while he naps.
'Oh the chap with the grease spot in the centre back of his jacket' said Chef.
Baroness Delyth Morgan of the Breast Cancer Campaign, which funded the work, said: “By piecing together how this happens, we can look at ways of preventing the disease and detecting it earlier to give people the best possible chance of survival.”
Tomorrow is National Scrapbook Day, a manmade holiday that was started by Creative Memories Consultants in 1995. It started as a day to work on your scrapbooks while celebrating the fun of connecting with others. It has now evolved into “big business” . Almost every scrapbook store is offering some type of NSD sale and you can find NSD retreats and crops popping up everywhere.
The guy is an awesome player and already has 1000 points for his career. He deserves an awesome nickname.
My thoughts.
There were 5 of us: 3 girls, and 2 boys.
The young man in his complete costume with his robe and crown of thorns carries the cross throughout the village and he pauses to reenact the stations of the cross. When he arrives at “Golgotha” he is crucified between the two thieves, and when he dies, all of the village churches darken their lights until Sunday morning. On Easter morning, the bells chime and all the lights are cut on for sunrise services.
Sentiment: Studio G
Of course there has to be rules, so here they are:
I won’t be uttering a word more until we are all done
I chalked around all of the edges and used foam tape on the truck.
Heydrich was an almost archetypal Nazi. In fact when looking at the higher ranking members of the party you don't tend to think of Aryan supermen. The diminutive Goebells, the swollen Goring, even the wildly gesticulating Hitler himself; none of these men were visions of the superior race they aimed to be the architects of. Heydrich however, was. Tall, slim and blond, he looks ruthless in his uniform and his CV is an impressive haul of Nazi atrocities. The man at the head of the SD, the intelligence service charged with rooting out and destroying resistance to the Nazi party, one of the organisers of Kristallnacht, instrumental in The Night of the Long Knives, Head of the Gestapo, Chairmen of the Wannsee conference at which the Final Solution was discussed and created, the kind of man who gained nickname after nickname: "The Hangman", "The Butcher", "The Blond Beast" and - this one given by Hitler himself - "The Man with the Iron Heart." The novel's title (the author having been warned away from the 'too sci-fi' Operation Anthropoid) comes from a saying within the SS: Himmlers Hirn heisst Heydrich - Himmler's brain is called Heydrich. A ruthless, intelligent and enthusiastic architect of the Nazi machine; Hitler didn't admire many men in his administration but you get the impression that a small smile appeared on his face every time he thought of Heydrich. Another fine orator, he never shied away from vocalising the harsh realities of Nazi policy
However, that perception is wrong, since the abuser has no right or authority to be judge, jury and executioner of anyone.
I'll post more artwork after they've been published, but in the meantime I'm working on the illustrations for the next four books!
The Tongs also had another side to them. Some Tongs use their power to extort local merchants, both legitimate and illegal. Tongs also recruited gangsters to do their dirty work. “Some of the tongs actually have a separate branch of gangsters that work for them. Who would enforce the rules and regulations.” The FBI has kept a list of criminally influence tongs. One of the major tongs was named “The Hop Sing Tong.”
Hope you'll look at the list of designers for Impression Obsession and Dreamweaver on my sidebar...always wonderful inspiration on those blogs.
Take eggs out of fridge for a few minutes to take the chill off them. Place in WIDE (this is important) saucepan so that eggs don’t go bumpity-bumpity into each other. Put in enough water to cover eggs. Bring to a boil, turn off heat and let sit there for 20 minutes. That’s it.
The BBC has announced that a new drama based upon the life of the marvellous late, great Kenny Everett (star DJ and TV personality) will be shown on BBC4 later this year.
Or perhaps it isn't - surprising that is - for in Pembrokeshire, all eyes are fixed on the coast, and the fen, being inland of the Fishguard to St David's road, is on the wrong side of the scenic divide. Even up close, it's one of those places you barely notice: a no man's land of scrub and mire that you vaguely undertand is what's beyond the hedgerows you're passing on the way to somewhere else.
After the post was posted up, the topic was one of the posts which is most hotly debated. The netizen had compared YoonA in Super Junior‘s MV and her currently in So Nyeo Shi Dae together, saying, “Is YoonA, by any chance, not natural beauty after all?”
Do I believe that the man who exposed the British Government for lieing about the threat to our country from Iraq, Dr David Kelly committed suicide? No.
No, how disturbing.
Rectangular savior,
Once you have found your buckets you need to drill two small holes in one end or side of each bucket. This holes need to be very small, less than 1/16th of a inch. This sounds small, but you want a slow dribble so that the moisture in the bucket all works it way into the soil around your transplants. You can always add more holes or make larger holes, but you can’t undo holes you have drilled. Progress slowly with your drill.
Happy to end the confusion, I pulled out 10 hundreds and handed them back to him. By then I hadn’t realised what had happened… or could have happened.
Here is another book review with spoilers, this time, divide misdemeanors by Laurell K. Hamilton.
To add to this already extremely satisfying eve, we had an unholy amount of hungry customers that were impatiently waiting for at least 45 minutes for a table. It was strange, I mean customers tend to get cranky any time they have to be on the waiting list for over 30 minutes, but last night... they were feeding off each others' negative energy. It was kind of like when toddlers are waiting in line to sit on the lap of a mall Santa. If one kid starts crying, then makes eye contact with another weary child, this sort of strong transcendent and emotional connection happens... Suddenly the latter child feels this need to cry, in some mimicking fashion that mirrors the actions of the first. Once the second kid starts to look around, and catches the eye of a new child, the domino effect takes a hold. The same damn thing happened last night, just replace the crying children in this scenario with "adults."
In Spain, where I occasionally spend some R&R time after one of my DK Power Weeks at work, a measure is dependent entirely on when the bartender remembers to stop pouring. If he gets distracted by a chica with particularly bueno bristolas, you could get a good gallon of G in your G&T.
With donations from Mr. Brandt’s photography supporters, the year-old organization now has 120 rangers, all local, who collaborate with communities to reduce poaching and conflicts between farmers and wildlife.
The really awesome thing, though, is that only one local TV channel bothered to interrupt their very important Tuesday afternoon schedule of sports programming and Friends re-runs to inform the public of this. Um, guys, this is possibly the highest traffic bridge in the Bay Area? And we’re not yet sure of the safety implications. You don’t think it might have been a good idea to let people know there was a problem?
I didn't learn that until I talked to Georgia and Garrison. Georgia had mentioned this little jazz club that she thought I would like and she said she wanted to go but two women alone wouldn't be proper.
So, with that being said, can we fast forward a couple of weeks ?
One way or another, though, what you contemplate, you imitate. Choose your contemplations well.
Saturday's two giveaways...first, the Ippity set Now & Always:
Get your piece of white cardstock and use your black pen to draw three border strips (see photo below) – make sure you do this by *hand*. The whole point and charm with these are that they should not be perfect and done with a ruler. Fill in black squares (again vary the length for a handmade look). You need to end up with one about 14 cm long and two at about 18,5 cm each.
Trying to impress your pretty girlfriend and friends by stepping out of that suburban comfort zone.
The mother of Marie Antoinette was Maria-Theresa of Austria. In 1755, Maria-Theresa sent her private physician, Gerard van Swieten, to investigate vampirism in Moravia. He (being a vampire, in my world) reported back that vampirism is a load of b******. So MT outlawed all those vampire-killing tactics people were using. This naturally led to a surge in the number of vampires, and something had to be done. That something was the French Revolution. (And you thought it was all about oppressed peasants and a broken system? LOL! That's what they wanted you to think!)
You dont need to leave a comment but if you do,it will count as a 2nd entry.
I remember seeing Russell Moore’s Facebook status the night before he posted his controversial post on Christian romance novels. It read, “Wondering whether posting my blog in the morning is worth all the hate mail it will bring!” While I don’t know how much hate mail he received I am sure it was a lot.
Basically, how long are you willing to stay with the protag before you see any redeeming qualities?
Thompson’s work was illustrated by Ralph Steadman’s grotesque ink blots, and early Didion by the ravishing photographs of the mysterious girl-woman: sitting barelegged on a stone balustrade; posing behind the wheel of her yellow Corvette; wearing an elegant silk gown and staring off into space, all alone in a chic living room.
And thanks to the hit 1999 movie Jantar Mantar, a generation of young people think that a gang of power hungry politicians, led by Jawaharlal Nehru, brilliantly if inaccurately played by Rashed Suhrawardy, killed a saintly president. While this is pure conspiracy nonsense, one can see why it was such a hit –– Nehru the younger was obviously the biggest beneficiary of the changed political circumstances.
I don’t really have an “action point” for this post. I don’t have any happy promises to wrap up the ending. Recounting the little incident still makes me feel furious. I take refuge in expressing anger (and sometimes bits of humor) about the culture of street harassment with other women, especially Stephanie, who has lots of stories in this dehumanizing department. But we don’t have any solutions. You get used to it, you adapt. You vaguely dream of a world in which your daughter might be able to exist as a human being, free to walk on a public street without being regarded as a sex toy, a manipulable body who owes mankind a smile. But that is often too hard to imagine.
It’s true we lost our water for several days, that’s just part of it though. It’s back but running brown through the faucet so we’re still bringing in buckets of rainwater and driving to a spring for drinking water. That will change again soon enough. Our front yard and garden was dug up for the second time in a year. Hours before the tap went dry we were reminiscing about living in the woods with our babies without water or electricity. How long ago was that? Cloth diapers, 101 recipes with rhubarb, the truth about poverty and the kindness of a Credit Union banker who would lend us money for groceries and life. Everything changes.
The hardest part was trying to stay still for the epidural. My contractions were very strong and still very close together, thus not giving much of a window of rest in between contractions for him to put the needle in. The RN was very good at helping me breath through the contractions as the anesthesiologist was inserting the needle, but I was definitely praying to God to bless his hands, and help me to stay still!
Alright, now that all of that cheerful stuff is over and done with, I can finally get on with my very favourite pastime; bitching and moaning about the book with a smile that could gobble up the Philippines. Note: while I enjoy whining, that doesn’t mean that any of these things actually matter. I mean, me swallowing the Philippines might be a bit of a dilemma, but whatever. To get the primary things out of the way; Haunting Violet plot isn’t overly complicated, and you can see some of the plot twists coming three miles away, because they might as well be wearing giant yellow signs proclaiming “I AM A PLOT TWIST RELEVANT TO EVERY MYSTERY EVER.” Examples include: “Oh! How on earth could Rowena’s suspicious death possibly be a murder? What’s the likelihood of that, mmm, mmmm?” and “the stick up Caroline’s is not in fact that she may have murdered someone, no, it is forbidden love!” Please, gag me with a spoon.
That's how we get to the part about Occupy Wall Street having some sort of influence on the right-wing led failure of the Supercommittee. It simply doesn't matter how ridiculous that idea is on its face.
The highlight of the day was the custard slice we ate at Valley Cats. The thing was superb. The usual pastry on top, but below was a light and airy filling – almost not a custard. Probably a whole bunch of whipped egg white in there.
We moved in here with all the bits and pieces of furniture which we've accumulated over our lives together. I didn't even buy new curtains - - - but made do with what we brought from our last home. While I LOVED those lace curtains on the cheery yellow wall in their FORMER life, I wasn't so crazy about them on a white wall - - - so I threw on the "scarf" for color.
03) She's Not There (Totp's)
“I am even owing the hotel here,the hotel manager won’t let me leave until i settle the hotel bills now am freaked out.So i have limited access to emails for now, please i need you to lend me some money so i can make arrangements and return back I am full of panic now,the police only asked me to write a statement about the incident and directed me to the embassy,i have spoken to the embassy here but they are not responding to the matter effectively, I will return the money back to you as soon as i get home, I am so confused right now.i wasn’t injured because I complied immediately.
And the Cradle will Rock
I used 3 cups of rehydrated Soy Curls instead of 3 cups of dry because the recipe didn't specify, but I did find that the dish had too much vegetable stock left in the morning. So I bet you're supposed to use dry Soy Curls. Quite frankly, I'm stingy with my Soy Curls since I have to order them, so if I made this again, I'd probably stick with the 3 cups of rehydrated curls and just add more lentils and less liquid. For this serving, I poured off some liquid, and it was perfect!
We walked down to the beach area and walking along the roadway footpath, I noticed a couple of people walking hand in hand along the lower down walking track.
It's really nice to sit on the deck on a balmy Christmas Eve night with good company, exchanging good wishes and gifts.
At the other extreme is Romney, opposing regulations to protect people in the environment with evidence based on emissions of carbon dioxide (CO2).
Answer: If you figure out how to garden in the snow, let me know. I assume a snow garden picture is as easy to find as a documented sighting of a sasquatch. If you’re referring to strong design and lots of evergreens making a garden interesting under snow, well, why didn’t you say so?
“I guess the pile of victims your police got is going to be dwarfed by this mountain,” said my informant, “Stories have been circulating for years about grubby payoffs that help sweep under rugs. But the big fat payoff the Feds want here is a 9/11 link”.
Do you really think that there is even one “bad guy” out there who thinks he is the “bad guy”? Or a “good guy” who never makes mistakes? We all act in support of what we think is right, and sometimes we are so far-sighted in reaching our goals, that we trip and stumble over the day-to-day choices right in front of us, whether it be balancing the books, choosing allies, or planning a campaign speech (hero to zero in 2 seconds for Howard Dean)
I am really annoyed by the cover changes though. Especially as I went out of my way to order my copy of White Cat from the US, just to avoid having an ugly cover!
I got his crib bedding though! It's coming through the mail now, I cannot wait to see it!
The movie takes place in a dystopian future where GeneCo is the most powerful corporation in the world. They provide organ transplants on payment plans and when people default on their payments, they send the Repomen to cut the organs out of the defaulters. Regrettably, REPO decides that it would be awesome to make these repo jobs bloody and gory, so we see lots of slicing skin and blood spilling and the pulling of organs out of bodies.
After 20 minutes in the oven, I pulled the lid off of the Le Creuset to check on the loaf.
To Him be glory and dominion unto the ages of ages. Amen.
It’s very scary that so many people in the year 2012 are still basing much of their prejudices and bigoted actions on an ancient book, which they cherry pick to justify their prejudices and oppression of other people, and ignore the ones that pertain to themselves.
in broad strokes of clarinet solos, surgeries, traffic stops,
where I had just made a card that fit the challenge, but fit the samples a little too closely for my comfort? Well....Friday turned out to be a very productive day...not only did I get another card made for the challenge, but I picked up some additional pieces of paper and made a third card!
51) whats your name? oh thats nice, i’ll probly never see you again, so… (hug and run)+%
This property of contagiousness has the potential to give us some insights into the neurological basis of imitation, face detection, and various other such social behaviours. Scientists have found that individuals with disorders like schizophrenia or autism (where the ability to infer the mental states of others is impaired), or even just schizotypal people, are markedly less prone to contagious yawning. It has even been suggested that increased rates of yawning might indicate that a person may recover from schizophrenia.
Check out the infographic below for some truly revealing statistics:
Mandy Hubbard is a literary agent for D4EO Literary, where she represents authors of middle grade and teen fiction. She is also the author of Prada & Prejudice (Penguin 2009), You Wish (Penguin 2010), and four other to-be-published novels for teens.
Thanks for dropping by to see my last project. If you've dropped by to see my Cute Card Thursday DT card, scroll down to the previous post and you'll find it there.
FA: Obviously it’s difficult to say. We need to analyse the race a little bit better – sectors etc – but I think we were between one and 1.5s behind Red Bull, especially in qualifying four races ago. In Barcelona, I think I was 1.2s and Felipe 1.6s or something like that, so the average was there and here, with similar characteristics, high-speed corners, exactly the same tyres, the soft and the hard, we were much closer so definitely an improvement. Here, for whatever reason, we were quick in sector two all weekend which is the high-speed sector, so maybe that means we have recovered a lot in that part and now we need to concentrate a little bit more on our strongest point that it was the slow speed corners where we need to make improvements.
Card fact: The Cincinnati Reds are abbreviated as the "Cinn. Reds" on this card. Apparently someone thought they were the "Cinnamon Reds."
It was rainy, so it was hard for me to see where we were going.
She is one of the first people I became friends with in the blog world.
Well, sooner came a week or so sooner than I though, as some of my Air Force buddies wanted to go out tonight to see what this whole Chicagostyle hot dog is all about. But tonight is also a night of celebration, but we'll get to that in another post soon.
Moral of the story? Gold is going up.
T-Mack the Artist is a sign of the times, a symbol of a new golden era in rap. The inspiration you get from his voice leads you not to be critical or judgemental but productive, as it should.
2) Jokes – My American Friend in the Pub.
For at least 12,000 years, humanity’s wisdom embraced hemp as an indispensable ally. For 74 years (except for those few years of Hemp For Victory!), cleverness in this nation now become the greatest parasite the world has ever seen has kept hemp our enemy. But wisdom hangs on in the more than 30 countries treating hemp as the supreme natural resource it has always been. Those countries feed the annual $450 million retail hemp business in this country—business living exclusively on imported raw materials.
Plot Overview: The book focuses on the lives of billionaire Christian Grey and college student Anastasia Steele who enter into an S&M relationship (he’s dominant, she’s submissive). The narrative is explained through prose typical of pulp fiction novels a la Mills & Boon.
Han: Oh, happy Martin Luther King Day. Have a drink on me.
I cannot wait to have the grill on the back deck and I can lounge!!
The deer sleep
I thinks I might have spotted the first b@stard-manager that I worked for in Tesco tonight. It was hard to tell after over a decade so I stalked him around the aisles, as if he were a Nazi war-crime suspect, whilst I tried to positively identify him through his renowned hair-style where the back of his head look like a cat’s @rse.I lost the suspect when I bumped – not physically – into an odd pensioner gentleman with size twenty shoes, who was examining and talking to a large box of Quaker Oats, whilst stinking of dog muck. It was like he had a force-field around him.
Madurai is the third largest city in the Indian state of Tamil Nadu and has a population of around 1.2 million people so it`s buzzing with activity and is often referred to as `the city that never sleeps.` My travelling companion particularly wanted to go there as he had been told of a clinic where he could get an Ayurvedic massage. This ancient Indian therapeutic massage improves the circulation, expels toxins and benefits our emotional well being. On this occasion it was to be delivered by two clinicians and involved a great deal of sweet smelling oils which are poured on to the forehead and then gradually massaged in to the body, so it sounded really nice.
this truck had my favorite chant of the day, if you missed it, it went
1) Pictures lie. Sometimes pictures make ugly things pretty, and pretty things prettier. Looking for houses based on RMLS listings is difficult. You look at the pictures online and love it. You go to the house and it's a shack!
Mzwandile Sicholo, the owner of the Come Again spaza shop, is undergoing surgery today to remove three bullets from his body. Sicholo was in a serious condition in GF Jooste Hospital and would be operated on this morning, a hospital spokesman said.
Tonight was the last Man's Cave/Ladies Night at church. It was a chili cookoff and lots of fun. I made white chicken chili and Champs made smoked pork chili. They were both really good - and neither of us won. Too sad, too bad, oh well.
Roshon & Chelsie – 5
You’ll take my word
October 11 @ Middle East (Boston, Massachusetts)
Shalimar was created in 1921 by Jacques Guerlain, and had been a classic and a reference in the world of perfumery. It's a beautiful amber oriental (one of the first one to include lots of vanillin), with bergamot, jasmine, rose, incense, tonka and vanilla. However, it is daring and, since it's been around for a while, will probably remind you of someone older you have encountered in your life (for me, that would be my french aunt. She now wears Mitsouko.)
“Inside.”
‘I’d like to do it, but I just don’t see it happening right now,’ she said. ‘Most of my friends say it’s just a piece of paper, and it doesn’t work out anyway.’
As soon as I got Twisted in my eager hands in late January, I quickly devoured it. Laura Griffin is one of my favorite romantic suspense author and one of my few auto-buy. She is a damn good writer; I have read quite a few of her books now and she has yet to disappoint me. Although Twisted is not my favorite by her (Snapped is) it's still very, very good.
Fox: S-S-Single Bed
I also made a new icecream. I have been experimenting and I think I have the texture perfect now! This one was:
Then slowly she began to recover, like a human baby’s development. Her kidneys finally returning to sufficient functioning to allow her to be taken off dialysis, her liver beginning to work, though probably somewhat compromised for the rest of her life.
Of course there was the $43 to get the urine out of Dave White's pants (totally my fault, but still).
I reached out for the kueh that was initially my breakfast but..
OUT OF BUSINESS.
By Dirk Johnson
Also, on a personal note, a very, very dear friend has undergone some major unexpected heart surgeries this past week, and I don't know how many pints of blood was used during these surgeries to save her life, but she did almost die. To those of you who donate, thank you so very much. And for those of you who pray, and have some extra space in your hearts to pray more, please keep her in your hearts so that her heart can continue to heal. She has a long, long road ahead, and it's because of a miracle and the grace of God that she is alive right now.
3-18-2012
With Jenn coming home from Pittsburgh, I took the opportunity to take a nice long weekend with her, and spend some time together around the house. This actually turned out to be much more productive than I had anticipated, such as with planting the orange tree yesterday. Today we spent the entire morning working in the yard, getting it ready for our animals.
Yet, despite all this, I walked into the Gap this weekend. I was desperate for some new basics, had exhausted all my other shopping options, and couldn't help but be drawn in by a giant red sign in the window screaming, "Buy any top get one free!"
This week we're here with a whole brand new challenge!
Next up... Toe Nash! Looks like this is the all-justice-system pack. Toe spent a year in the minors and was, for a while, highly praised and considered to be the next big thing. He was later arrested numerous times and is now a registered sex offender.
And in your ignorance and egomania – did you really believe you would be able to hide it?
Publisher: Penguin
But I am sure others still remember catching a glimpse of Cher on Henry Street back in 1987.
Here’s a few pics of the run. In the third pic you can just see the road climbing steeply up to the right hand side of the photo. Gulp!
He was apparently urinating blood and would have to undergo further tests today.
Burnsville,” he said.
There are many different kinds of educational toys these days. Some help the child to develop in just one way, while others help them in several ways. Children should have access to as many good quality educational toys as possible, but even if they have only one or two that is better than none. However, children tend to find things to play with that were not really intended as toys. Plastic bottles can become toys to a child. They can be used as a shaker, for pouring water in the play-pool, to fill with sand or to roll along the path. All such activities stimulate the child in some way.
With pubs like Craft around, it's a great time to be a beer drinker.
Although it's marketed for babies, this "first doll" is also perfectly appropriate to preschool girls who are going through a mothering phase. Right now, my daughter is all about taking care of babies, and this one is a wonderful pick. It makes appropriate cooing and giggling noises, and there's a fabric bottle attached to her hand that you can use to "feed" her-- there's also a sensor, so the baby makes sucking noises during feedings.
The trio had barely made it to the camp proper before they were surrounded by a crowd of cheering people. The noise rousted the girl from her light slumber and her dirty little head swiveled on her neck, her eyes darting rapidly in search of her parents’ faces. Then, suddenly, they went wide and Rayloth looked to see the old man who had briefed them when they had arrived, his short white hair looking as if he had been pulling at it the entire time they’d been away. Next to him, pushing her way around him, was a short, plump lady with her graying hair pulled back into a tight bun. The plump woman elbowed her way through the crowd as if they were little more than swamp stalks and was reaching for her daughter just as the little girl was squirming herself out of Jerf’s grip. The two fell to the ground, the mother’s arms clinging tightly to the daughter as if she was determined to never let her go again. Both let loose a flood of tears he was sure had been on the verge of eruption for days.
And finally, a very simple, but very different version of this classic Brazilian cocktail:
I used just two colors here with the white crayon and finished it off with black sharpie. Watercolor is more difficult for me to control so I cannot imagine ever painting something tight and neat with it! As long as I can be messy I am good.
Kosher Photographer
Murray Hamilton – The Mayor
We got to the city at 10:30am. Our hotel, The Carlton, was only a 15 minute walk from the bus stop, so we made our way there, and thankfully our room was ready to check in (yay) so we were able to have a quick rest and dump our stuff before heading off.
Mainly it's the independent bond-holders who have CDSes, not the big banks or Greek pension funds. And there are a load of CDS-holders who don't even have any Greek bonds - they are just hoping to profit from a Greek default by insuring something they don't even own.
I had a Demon Collector synopsis roughed out when we sold Mortlock and it was part of the package. I didn’t have a trilogy in kind at first in fact Demon Collector started as a modern YA novel idea but it wasn’t working for me. The moment I pitched it into Victorian London, it all fell into place. I wouldn’t say I’ve turned it around quickly either, it’s sitting on my editor’s desk right now and I’m sure it’ll come back with lots of ‘suggestions!’
Now that Elizabeth has ‘disappeared’, rumours continue to fly. Is Elizabeth actually alive? Was she kidnapped – No-one knows except 3 high society citizens. Penople & Diana are back to try and win Henry’s heart. But Henry had plans of his own as he discovers Elizabeth’s mysterious death. The Hollands old maid has made it to her dream. To be a Luxe girl. But as she finds out, money is good but gossip is everything.
Rachel McLish (Aces: Iron Eagle III)
Cocoa
John Leckey has given representatives of Matt Baggott seven days to tell him why he was now objecting to his plan to process an estimated one million documents relating to nine long-delayed inquests.
4. The covenant will give everlasting peace
Amy: I like fart night better.
And I am her brother.”
Did I mention the abundance of wonderful Russian sayings, black humor, superstitions and folklore? Unlike perestroika these are in fact universally adored. Running through the book is this joke of “Armenian Radio” from the USSR in the ’50s: a pretend call-in question and answer radio show. Example:
Phase Two (July until December):
I thought mine was way too bold and bright, since I tend to like my background to be just that - a background. I want my focal image(s) to stand out. So I watered down some gesso and brushed a wash over the whole thing. I like it this way much better, although it's still kinda busy.
When I was given the opportunity to work with the Mindwaves project I was very excited about the prospect. Not only did I consider it work that I believed in but I also appreciated the experience it would give me. Having once had mental problems myself I understood that it was difficult for people to share their problems due to the stigma attached. I felt that by promoting good stories surrounding mental health we could help tackle this serious problem. I too have taken a great interest in journalism and found this to be the ideal role in giving me experience. On a much more personal level, the role has given me a renewed sense of purpose. It has also aided in my recovery from depression.
Hanging them is a two person job. I attached strong picture wire hanger to each of them in varying lengths. The wire usually comes rolled up, I put on leather gloves and used my hands to help stretch the wire out straight. The weight of the pomanders will help to straighten the wire out over time as well. I used anchors and hooks from the hardware store that can hold up to 50lbs. (I can't remember the name of them, but the salesperson at your local hardware store should be able to direct you.) This is step is especially important when you are hanging something above your first born child's head! I then had my lovely assistant (my husband) hold them
1 (14-ounce) can sweetened condensed milk
The big companies have those manuals of policies and procedures for a reason. To borrow a saying, good decisions come from experience and experience comes from bad decisions. The big company is so afraid of someone doing something wrong, they try to write procedures that will eliminate all chances of errors, which means they eliminate all independent thought from the day to day running of the company.
“Finally, all of you, have unity of spirit, sympathy, love for one another, a tender heart, and a humble mind. Do not repay evil for evil or abuse for abuse; but, on the contrary, repay with a blessing. It is for this that you were called—that you might inherit a blessing.” (1 Ptr. 3:8-9)
Presented by the RI Foundation’s, Jill Pfitzenmayer, Ph.D., this workshop will cover the key components to creating a successful evaluation plan for your program or nonprofit. You will learn about methodology, data collection tools, and basic data analysis.
I can be really mean towards you
There’s a couple guys from our church that are working on this. If you can’t make it out to it, would you consider praying? There’s some great action steps at the bottom of this message you should consider as well…
15. You Gotta Lose (with Elvis Costello)
“But we have not drawn any conclusion. We are still awaiting the pathology report before wrapping up the case,’’ he said.
So this is the kind of people we are dealing with here. They launder money, smuggle firearms, plan and carry out assassinations and bombings, and conduct intense Islamist indoctrination, including inside American prisons.
"I need to talk to Sean. I'm just waiting for a good time . . ."
Right there on the corner of Atlantic and Clinton, it's open for business and respectable filled with patrons. The corner was enclosed last year and I heard about the desire to open the spot up, but when exactly did all that happen?
"'All men are created equal' says the American Declaration of Independence. 'All men shall be kept equal' say the Socialists."
At 4 AM this January morning
Another Serious Eats article that caught my eye, this one from a few weeks ago: How to send wine back without looking like a jerk. It is in the form of a short video and gives a reassuring strategy on how to handle what could be an uncomfortable situation. The title alone was worth a smile.
At -2.3% in March, real interest rate — the difference between the policy rate and inflation — continued to be expansionary (though less expansionary than -3.8% in January. Nonetheless, even by this count little room to ease monetary policy.
Second, one might also argue that the system worked, at least so far, in this legislative check of the County Executive. Leggett clearly misstepped by introducing and pressing an expedited bill — requiring a 6-3 vote — over the head of Public Safety Committee chair Phil Andrews. The back and forth about the initial “rush to judgment” that was “wisely” delayed was evidence of some sensitivity to that by several council members.
To enter the challenge, please provide your name and a DIRECT link to your NEW creation by 7pm ET on Thursday, July 21st. One lucky winner will be selected and posted on Friday morning with our Top 5 Stampers. Good luck!
Dear Mathman: Thank you for such a wonderful semester in AP Calculus. From constantly correcting your mistakes, your odd jokes and your quirky personality, it has truly been a pleasure finally being able to take a class with you. I know we were unable to cover much math in class, but I understand why and I sincerely appreciate all the time you put forth for the class. Honestly, I have never seen a teacher put more effort into their students than you. It is no wonder so many students find you to be their favorite teacher. Thank you so much for an enjoyable semester and for being an excellent teacher.
As I’ve already alluded to, it’s not for everyone. If you’ve seen it, you already have an opinion on it for good or for ill. It you have not seen it… check it out… in its entirety is my suggestion, then leave a comment if you like?
But... it's not Thanksgiving yet and I wasn't going to cook a turkey just for supper for the 3 of us. So, back to the cold frame search. I chose a colander full of spinach, I had some ham in the refrigerator, I'd make a quiche. Barbara and Josh both like quiche.
First we’ll pick our 5 topics of interest (more on that in a minute)
Society is quick to gravitate towards a populous movement amplified by the media and activists, then to create racial division. We have seen this stunt time and time again, a criminal act has been committed and racial propaganda is used to kindle more anger in the people. People are eager to fight the cause and march aside Al Sharpton believing it’s the right thing to do–there is nothing wrong with that–but when you only fight injustice for Blacks, you force injustice to the color line.
2010, through you I accomplished so much. Achievement. Hurt. Humiliation. Elation. The making of new friendships. The transformation of old friends into enemies. The abandonment of the familiar, the safe, for the great unknown. You gave me a son. You gave me the feeling that everything and nothing was impossible. 2010, you scared the fuck out of me, and never let me act like a little bitch about it. I hate you 2010. And I thank you for every single minute.
8. Playing in the Band - 23:30
This date range comes from Jennie herself, who you would think would be a reliable source. In 1908 she had released a memoir, The Reminiscences of Lady Randolph Churchill. She does not state a birth date, but in the very first sentence of the book, she wrote, “My father was for three years American Consul at Trieste, and Italy thus colored my first impression of life, although I was born in Brooklyn, in the state of New York.”
What else can I say? I do apologize for being neither as elegant or thought provoking as I used to be. It’s the nature of the game. Hopefully it won’t be five months before I post again.
modern bands that try something like that, that actually deranges.
What is,
I won't allow self-doubt to plague my efforts any longer. I will be what I want to be, and move forward in the direction I want to go. There's a lovely quote from Melody Ross I'll leave at the end of this post because it pretty much describes everything I have realized the past 6 months. She says it more beautifully than I ever could:
It's a very rare occurance here at the sushi boy household. But, because sushiboy was so awesome at his company christmas party we won some gift certificates. I'm so excited I can't stand it. We're going to go see "The Foreigner" here at a local play house and then we're going to Texas Roadhouse for dinner. Now I just need to get the house picked up so that sushi's sister and brother in law who graciously agreed to babysit don't think we're total slobs. :P Oh, and I need to make myself look pretty, that takes some time. I'm not what you call a natural beauty. It takes a little work here! :) I'll update later about how it was!
Morning everyone I hope you are all well...I had an awesome weekend this week as I got to meet some of my gorgeous blogging buddies....Saturday night was quite nerve racking as I was asked over to Debbie P's (fellow MDUC DT) house to join in a girls night in with the awesome, Karen Yates (fellow MDUC DT), Bronlyn Jones (Shop Bron), Zoe Mitc (Make is Crafty) and Bron's sisters Sharon & Christine but as soon as I arrived at Debbie's house and was welcomed by a big hug from her and Karen my nerves were gone...We had a great night enjoying some champers, colouring, making a candle and of course just gas bagging..It is strange as I said I have never met these ladies but we talk so often over email etc I felt like I have known them for years....The sad thing is that Debbie and I only live about 25 minutes apart and it has taken us this long to meet IRL...I just know that we want take that long to see each other again..
1 hate
In a bowl, stir together flour, salt, cocoa powder and baking powder. Add the dry ingredients to the lentil mixture and stir together until just combined. Transfer to a small bowl and chill for at least 15 minutes (up to overnight). Note: the mixture is crumbly.
The open heaven, the door of God
Now let me give you a little background on my friends house. This is a house in which four girls live; they never lock their garage, they never lock their back door, and they have a lot of lawn furniture and two bicycles that sit unlocked in their unfenced back yard. Not to jink them, but these girls have never had their house broken into, and have never had anything stolen from their back yard or garage. So, I'm figuring it's a safe bet to leave my bike in their backyard, so much so that I don't even lock up my bike (my fault) for a night.
On checking the taxi out in her office she found out that the roof sign and number plate did not match. A bogey taxi.
Betty R~Starting Again
Firstly, while I won't be making anymore out-of-state trips for at least the rest of this year (plans always change, but I don't see it happening), I will be going to Spooky Empire in Orlando again this year, but as a filmmaker! I've been asked to be on two separate filmmaker panels during the convention! I don't have anything playing in the concurrent film festival, but it'll be fun to do those panels; thank you to Tim Anderson and Jesse Kozel for asking me!
P for prescriptions, We have quite a few, just give us a pill and We'll be good as new!
I bought myself a couple of KBON t-shirts and a koozie that said “AIEEEEE where’s the ice chest babe?” Man I wish I had come up with that slogan first. It would have looked great on our brewery’s koozies.
-You refer to your friends as Mr. or Mrs.
As he bent down to nuzzle my face
Therefore, especially when you are dealing with the Type B and the Type D personnel, take the initiative to update them on everything you are permitted to disclose. They would appreciate it. You just have to make sure that you follow the ideal coaching or counseling process and start with setting expectations and laying down the objectives of the conversation before breaking updates to them gently and positively. It’s going to be much more of a problem when they find it out (especially those who are deeply concerned with their future or movement in the company) from somebody else or when they discover it themselves.
And of course, there “transcendental meditation” and other such ways of seeking “peace” – a this-worldly feeling of contentment which has nothing to do with true spiritual striving
Wow, I’m behind at posting Logan’s weekly photos! Life has gotten so busy now that Logan is walking everywhere (even running sometimes!). We have taken the photos every week, but I just haven’t gotten around to editing and posting them. Story of my life, right? So, here are a few…
11.East West Side (Produced by The Vamp)
William Arthur Gardner, 45, Lynbrook, N.Y.
I would just LOVE if you all would join me over at The Ruby Nest where I am more able to share all of my creations with you and keep better track of comments, shared ideas, inspirations, etc!
None of my relatives from the old countryside could recall a single complaint from her. Year after year, my grandmother labored with sweat in the field, bending down to reap the wheat and corn…. When my father hesitated whether or not he should stop trying after failing twice in the College Entrance Examination, my grandmother simply gave him a powerful slap in the face. Illiterate as she was, she understood that those tiny yet enchanted characters printed on the paper would shape his destiny. When my father finally got admitted to a college, granny sold a pig and treated everyone in the village for a feast.
AD: Oh. What do you normally do under these circumstances?
“He verified Bottieri’s version of the events,” an affidavit states.
Salty.
"Something is getting under your skin. Maybe it's that you've worked really hard for a better life in some way, and it continues to elude you. Maybe it's that someone in your world is causing unnecessary friction over a non-issue. Maybe it's that too much is expected of you in your work environment, and you're not properly respected or compensated for it. But whatever it is, it's nagging at you. While you may not be able to immediately resolve this issue, Moonchild, you don't have to suffer from it either. Your life is slowly but surely getting better. Allow yourself to see the better times that you can probably sense are coming soon."
Jermaine Paul (Team Blake) @JermainePaul – Singing Against All Odds by Phil Collins. This is the chance that Jermaine has been tweeting about. To show a softer side of him. The dude has a voice on him. This was nice version of the song. He sounded a little like R Kelly in the chorus. Xtina said she feels he is a phenomenal singer. She said he is her favorite. Cee Lo said he looked sharp and he said Phil Collins is one of his favorite singers. He also said he is definitely one of the strong contenders in the competition. Adam said I love you 3x time think at this point. (not playing the @shieldsbrothers drinking game tonight and very grateful). Blake said tonight’s performance tonight was a turning point. From that, I feel Jermaine is not going home tonight. Or he is sending him home and he was just telling him to remember his performance. That would suck. 1-855-VOICE-07
Other: Moroccan Motifs Impression Plate PTI, Lil' Inker Designs Flag Die, Pop Dots, Corner Chomper
This is our little fire pit area. I need some new cushions for these chairs. Waiting for them to go on sale:o) And we are still trying to figure out what to do with all of that brick that is stacked up against the house...any ideas? And no, we are not doing a fireplace...too expensive:o)
Such is not the case with paper money. If the citizens don’t like a program, to hell with them! The central bank can just print up some money and give it to the politicians to spend. If the powerful banks make bad loans and get themselves into financial trouble, just print some money and bail them out. Huge deficits? No problem. Just have the Federal Reserve print some money and buy government bonds. Wars? Welfare? Spying on citizens? Boondoggles? Yes on all counts!
Unfortionatly it is not a strong. I had two of them...
I'll try to get some pictures soon. It's a bit late today and the light is terrible, so you'll have to use your imagination. Actually, your imagination is probably better than the reality, so I may just let that suffice.
We know we can’t do it but we try anyway. We take the flimsiest of foundations and stack life on top of it, expecting the plates to stay in the air and then marvel when they all fall down.
Big eyed beans from Venus.
"Ok moth, you win this round, but the war isn't over yet. Just you wait!" I threatened out loud to no one in particular while Jackson, who'd just walked into the room, looked at me like I needed psychiatric help.
Using Photoshop Elements, I separated the three parts, recolored the egg and cup, and put them back together in robin's egg blue and araucana green tones. They would make such pretty table and place settings, easter basket tags, or gift tags!
“I’m certain he doesn’t do this without legal authority,” Lieber replied, not without some exasperation.
This isn't very suprising considering it came from Brazil, the country that brought us Carnival, maybe even the thong bathing suit. I wonder if they set up tastings in maternity or baby stores?
Finally we got to our concerns that we may have for Evan, and like usual I draw a blank, except for his vocabulary or lack there of. We've been evaluated by the PAT, twice a year since he was born. At our recent evaluation we filled out our annual forms and review what milestones and motor skills he's accomplished or behind in.
Most of the time, getting a drink feels like putting on a band-aid on to help cover up whatever is going on. Whether you:
I got some days of undistracted unplugged time – and I mean it, no calls, chat’s with peers/ managers, no emails and here comes a new one: no social media at all – no consuming, no ‘just checking’. UNPLUG! I did not plan it, it just happened. I asolutely enjoyed it! And I realized that lately I have been more consumed by beeing in the trot. That’s exhaustive, it’s so not supportive! How can you give, lead, coach when you barely have the time to breath? I realized that I was more and more managing things and stuff and tasks and all – I did not realize how often I should have delegated instead of doing… Um, bad. And that results in not beeing as productive as wanted.
5) Positive reinforcement is the best way to earn your child's respect.
This virtuous circle was broken by Reagan-era policies intended to weaken the power of ordinary workers. Wages no longer kept pace with productivity growth, eliminating the automatic link between productivity growth and demand growth. This led to excess capacity in the economy, which was filled in the 1990s with demand generated by the stock bubble and in the 2000s with demand generated by the housing bubble.
Today I turned 23 years old. This month also marks this lovely blog, The Poison Pen, running for a whole year. I wanted to do a major post but time doesn’t permit that this evening.
Length perfect on me.
How do people handle these things elsewhere?
He does not, however, understand the bear statue at all. Is this entirely necessary?
You know, if you're wondering what being a nine-year old kid is like, you're lucky 'cuz I'll tell you. In San Francisco, life here as a kid, well, let's just say it's not boring life but it's not exotic life either. I think am going to build my family here for now. You never know what life or future brings. But San Francisco is a very special place and I am very lucky to live here.
Losing/giving up control is something I've kind of worked through for awhile now - when you deal with infertility you quickly learn that there is much you can't control, and you "hurry up and wait" months at a time while waiting for treatments, going through treatments, waiting to see if the treatments worked, and starting that cycle over again. I thought I got pretty good at it, but apparently not! :-)
2. The Call to Adventure
My name is Luka
No, seriously, that's it.
Evert
The striking central staircase had a refurbished roof light allowing daylight to infiltrate all the floors and a stunning lighting pendant with multiple fishbowl shades dropping all four floors from the roof to the ground.
Simply charge the device over night so that it is good and ready to go for your usage. Once charged, turn it on and pair it with your blackberry device…the instructions are quite simple. The pairing process complete, you are ready to clip this in your cars visor and begin the process of becoming a road warrior.
The bell rang rather sharply.
But I don't have the plentiful half-seconds of free time I used to have. Once upon a time I did things other than work and thought of my publishing house as the place I visited, and my apartment as the place I lived. But that was back in Episode IV.
Jimi had a few days of intense jealousy and looking longingly at my bike until he found a bike which he will go and pick up tommorow… from Edinburgh.
To be fair, the amount of work and time required to fully understand someone is significant; who has the time to do this? Most people already have trouble understanding themselves, much less immerse themselves in someone else’s life for the purpose of some sort of deeper understanding – especially if that person is a stranger and if your parents have warned you against him.
Once every month I can meet with other people who understand, who don't say "I don't know how you do it" because they do it too.
Both firms are Texas-based: ExxonMobil and Maxus Energy Corp.
I feel lucky everyday. I have an amazingly wonderful husband, two gorgeous and healthy sons, a wonderful bestie, an amazing job that I love going to everyday AND I won a trip to London in June! See why I feel lucky?
It seems that the dominant narrative even twenty years after the riots is the victimization of African American as minorities–whether in terms of economics, discrimination or police brutality. Tolerance, national apology and the cry for reform and a nation to do something on behalf African American captures the national dialogue.
Notes from Chapter 7, the Crown Chakra.
The most important thing is the shape of the shoe. Working for a bank and attending church weekly means I see men’s dress shoes all the time. I assume that most men either buy their dress shoes from Wal Mart or have their wives/LTR’s/mothers do it for them because they all look like larger versions of kid shoes. You don’t want to wear a shapeless blog of leather on your feet. If your shoe adds any weight or heft to the look of your foot, it’s made wrong. Here are a couple I actually found from Wal Mart
8. Why didn’t Ezra ask for an armed escort (Ezra 8:21-30)? What did he do instead? On what occasion did the disciples follow suit (Acts 14:23)?
The summer sun may turn dark and cold (I Love You, LY) ‘Round and ’round we spin and dance
I disagree. I see value in both heroines. Why? Because for one, we're not all like Hermione. We don't all have the inner strength to go out and get the bad guy. Two, Bella's character is a wonderful way to open a dialogue with your own daughters. I have had great discussions with my daughter over the Twilight movies. She sees Bella's choices and knows that they're the wrong ones. They have consequences. But she also realizes that it is just a story. (And yes, we could get into a deep discussion on how fictional character can influence us, but that is for another day).
Last time, we discussed a brief historical account of the Y chromosome research-wise. Initially up to 17 traits were attributed to the chromosome but Stern and later Ohno argued that it was instead largely devoid of gene content. While they were mostly right, and we will see why, that view is now a bit simplistic and this is what the series aims to correct. This post will now provide a brief comparison of the X and Y chromosomes (in humans) and lay out some of the chromosome’s basic architecture.
It wasn’t one of these serious film interviews, frankly. And thank God for that as Rik Mayall (he of the above) and Adrian Edmondson indulged in a battle royale of fact and underpants talk on the campaign trail for their new film, Guest House Paradiso.
Make the pizza dough according to those instructions in the link exactly. Par bake it to crisp.
And then the absurdity of that struck, and I said, "Have fun" and closed my mouth again. This child-of-mine, despite her name and similar appearance, is not the same person she used to be. She no longer needs (if she ever did) the type of parenting I had been about to offer.
As for poor little Amy, God knows I pray for all the little children who are sick or abused. I’ve always felt that the children and animals are the innocent victims of the ruthless and somewhat cruel society we have built. (And, I’M an optimist!) I pray for her and all of them, and I donate to the American Cancer Society, Breast Cancer Support Fund and St. Jude’s Children’s Hospital…. but I won’t forward her chain text! I’M not heartless but threats and insults to try and get money from donors in a less than reputable way IS!
That way a leader is better able to leverage on fortuitous events that occur on his watch and better equipped to limit the damage of the unpropitious, always given that an amoral stance towards anything and anyone ensures that nothing sticky attaches to his Teflon flanks.
It’s this really cool little restaurant that just popped up on the square near my house. They do a fusion of latin and asian food, and boy oh boy is it good. I went with my mom; we’re kinda funny because every time we go, we order the same thing.
Ah, love, let us be true
But the worst part is that allowing young people unfettered access to information tricks them into thinking that they actually know things – that’s damned dangerous. It leads to them forming opinions and once they have those it’s a short drive to contradicting elders, questioning authority, recreational drug use, dirty dancing and rampant flag burning.
Best Blog Post of The Year Award: This hysterical post from none other than my genius baby sister who got all the looks, talent, brains and writing ability in the family. A hilarious piss take of what glamour models have to say about current affairs.
Hugs to you all. I'll try to stop by tomorrow and leave YOU ladies some long overdo love as well. And if anyone figures out how to add more hours in a day, please share how you did it with me.
The Shining: As soon as possible?
Do you have your plan for today? The next project is rekindling an interest in an old hobby of your husband's. My husband never really had any hobbies, he has always enjoyed farming. I think I'll pick up a farm magazine for him today and have it waiting for him when he gets home.
and not so apart
So d’Amboise started bringing professional dance teachers and musicians into public schools – not in after-school programs but as a vital part of the regular curriculum, offered free to every child who wants to participate. He has hiked the Appalachian Trail to raise funds for his program, and inspired hundreds of dancers to get involved.
Sometimes, I let the hype deter me. Sometimes, the fact that everyone is raving about a book is actually an incentive for me to not pick it up. Because I'm sick of hearing about it, so the last thing I want to do is start reading it. But in those instances when I do finally dust off the dust jacket and pick up a copy, I want nothing more for all the hype to be completely, and utterly right.
i can still recline,
“In every society, the definition of marriage has not ever to my knowledge included homosexuality. That’s not to pick on homosexuality. It’s not, you know, man on child, man on dog, or whatever the case may be.”
Not surprisingly, a lawyer representing various clothing designers was quite happy with the news, saying that they don't want those clothes "back on the street," which suggests that the designers may have pushed for the police to destroy the clothes rather than help the needy. Of course, it's worth pointing out -- yet again -- the recent study that showed most people are not fooled by counterfeits, and they rarely represent a "lost sale." In fact, many counterfeit purchases lead to real purchases later on. So the idea that they act as a "substitute" or somehow "harm" a brand is not actually borne out by the research. And, of course, some companies have learned that there are ways to embrace counterfeiting to their own advantage, as a form of price differentiation.
One would have hoped that this pronouncement, “almost never,” would be understood as a assurance that women and men would be protected from repressive and unjust treatment; one would have wished that the stipulated conditions would be seen, by legislators and government who claim Islam, as an imperative to promote equality before the law and justice among humans. Nothing could be further from the reality. Behind an Islamic discourse that minimizes the reality and rounds off the angles, and within the shadows of this “almost never”, lurks a somber reality where women and men are punished, beaten, stoned and executed in the name of hudûd while Muslim conscience the world over remains untouched.
There was actually something going on at Oberlin. Pay The Man was a big deal. They recorded some stuff, it was number one on the college radio station. My freshman year alone there was another band that Chris Brokaw was in called The Full-Bodied Gentlemen, there was a band called What Fell that was kind of a pop band but kinda grimy, there were a couple of weird bands. Being in the middle of nowhere, with the closest major city being Cleveland and maybe 3000 people on campus, there was a shocking amount going on. Every weekend you could go out, there would be keg parties and bands playing. I'm not saying they were all great, but they were doing stuff, you would learn songs and it felt like something real. It wasn't like a Battle of the Bands in high school. When I would go to the Battle of the Bands in high school, there would be eight bands, and five of them would do the same Quiet Riot song. These were bands writing their own material, having some level of ambition.
The others on the prison floor tell similar stories, but no one ever believes us. Not people like us.
So I said all of this to say...if you were a lover of the beauty posts...they're on their way back! I hate that everyone has to suffer when I go thru my ruts! lol But like I've said in other posts...it's all a big cycle/circle...everything works hand in hand... If I get up and get my workout in first thing in the morning, it gives me energy for my day, I get up and apply my makeup, do my hair, take a little more time in my clothes selection, get out the door, come home and still having energy to take care of the household, and I go to sleep earlier so I can do it all again the next day. And there are so many gaps and holes in my circle right now, hence the ruts...but I'm working on reversing that as we speak!
03: Aerosol – Morning is A Blur (03:41)
My Prayer: "Lord once again I struggle with change and I know others do too, please strengthen us, guide us and direct our steps. And please Lord no more sales on chocolates."
2. Signs Of Life (04:11)
and this was taken from a postcard at a souvenir shop after lunch today on Rue Cler.
Last week, Gracie at I Am Writer, Hear Me Roar! gave me the Kreativ Blogger Award. Gracie also happens to be another participant in the 21 Minus blogfest. Thanks Gracie!!!
But they are fighting over matters to do with Michael Laws? Nonononono. Even if the matter isn't to do with Laws, it is now as you all commented to the media about it.
he did this several times where he'd talk to the ball, look at it questioningly, twist his arm around, and make some funny little noises that i totally can't describe, but it was an absolute hoot!!
We have options, of course, when asked this question. We can just say "Yes." We can say we "homeschool" and let people have their imaginations (this usually involves me being perceived as doing a Lot of Work to cram information into the children's otherwise thick, clay-like noggins). Sometimes I say we "unschool". That nearly always elicits an alarmed response. Sometimes I say, "My kids don't go to school," which is usually assumed as "homeschooling" - but also, occasionally, seriously rattles grownups. I have yet to meet someone who jumps to the correct conclusion: autodidacticism, but I know some day that will happen.
TEAPOT LIONFACE: Well, never mind, can’t take all this crap to Paris. Catch you on the flip side!
Obviously, this post is WAY overdue. And I haven't posted for a few weeks now. I was so busy with school, and so stressed out that I kind of got to the point where I actually avoided this blog. I can't believe I did that because this blog is very important to me and you, my readers, have been an amazing source of encouragement and support. I am sorry if I let you down and I hope you will udnerstand and forgive me for it. I let my self down too because, some day as I reach all of my goals, I will look back on this and realize I missed some important parts of the journey in my documentation. But... life goes on.
Many of the other "manners" have to do with children saying please, thank you, and excuse me, all of which come with their own sets of confusing rules from society. I know these words are things that are valued by society. I do explain to my children that people like to hear these words, because it makes people feel good. But if my child forgets to say one of these things when expected, I step in and say it for her. And I say these things to my children often.
This has been a major request from iPhone users. If you buy a new iPhone, or restore, or update your iPhone, then you would have to sync with your computer to get all your previous settings (restore from backup). But, now, with iCloud, you also have PC-free over-the-air updates and syncing. This means that you will not need to connect your iOS 5-based device to a computer to restore to previously saved settings, or to download previous apps.
The simple answer to these questions:
Thinking about you and me
2. You have a new novel that will be published later in the year (Shatter) and it sees the return of Joseph O'Loughlin. He appears to be the type of character that has enormous potential in terms of emotional development. Is this one of the reasons for his return?
I’m highly annoyed. Since last week, these public transit uncomfiness has increased numerous degrees. Strangers approaching with topics of conversation like the night sky being so pink or the moon being so little, being stopped to be told I just missed my train and I have to wait a few more minutes (really now!? I didn’t know that!?), graffiti sketches of guns being shown to me to get my opinion, being holla’d at, told I’m stopping all the traffic, and the friendly convenience store man out of nowhere suddenly using that creepy tone of interest rubbing his palms together… GOODNESS!!!
WHY? We are in need of volunteers to pour beer, man the dunking booth and serve snow cones
A: Rattlesnakes live in A-meri-ca which is where YOU come from..
I could melt to the floor when you lay your head on your daddies chest.
"I don't want to live with myself," said Barley. "I can't think of anybody worse to live with."
Please take some time to visit these terrific hosts and all those joining in on the fun!
-2 avocados
So today is (national?) Take Your Child To Work Day. We have rules for it here at my company, but "rules' is a relative word when it comes to a multi-child household, I guess. I dunno...
In short, if you put on an act just like these guys show you, you can make it look a lot like you have psychic powers. And not just to stupid people.
4 – Get the Basics Right
And it takes place in the so-called tropical paradise of Mauritius — the palm-fringed holiday destination of more than 200,000 Britons each year.
Equally internal and external, present in all three levels of vision (corporeal, imaginative, intellectual) and in all three universal worlds (gross, subtle, mental), black universe is analogous to the divine image, following Eriugena: “the Divine likeness in the human mind is most clearly discerned when it is only known that
Keith’s mouth hung agape. He jumped slightly when Sarah set a bowl of fruit and cake in front of him. Amy set her bowl in front of her mother, smiling wanly upon receiving an absent-minded pat. Once done, the girls lined up at the end of the table. Mommy stayed looking right at him.
It’s been a pretty much continuous climb since leaving La Paz, but unfortunately I can’t provide an altitude estimate as I forgot to bring my GPS along for this trip. The snow-covered peak in this shot is the right-most (west?) side of Illimani. I know that somewhere along here there is a hiking trail that will heads right up to the peak. Folks I know that have done it claim that it is not too tough, although at this altitude I’m not convinced.
Shepherd’s pie – and we always called it shepherd’s pie even if technically it was cottage pie, was the cold beef or mutton minced with a hand mincer, carrots, onion and left over gravy, with a dash of tomato sauce or Worcester sauce stirred into the mix. It was put in a deep dish and topped with mashed potato; there was no cheese or crumb sprinkled on it, nor sliced tomato. It was cooked in the oven so there was a crispy top and served with vegetables, anything seasonal from the garden or tinned peas and carrots if there was nothing else. We did not have cooked mince as such; I only came across that sloppy goo for school dinners.
The lights went out. Natalie screamed in the dark and the world shook apart around her.
Not sure if it's the time of year, and folks are busy, but few comments on my Giveaway....You can STILL scroll down to the May Day post to Enter. You do NOT need to have a Google account,,,Just sign in "anonymous" with your Email addy to Enter!
More than once I have been asked the likes of, “Where were you twenty years ago? Had I known this message of grace then, it would have made all the difference in the world in my life.” My reply is usually the same. “Would you have believed it twenty years ago?” The answer is almost always the same; “No.”
the time the kids walked in through the door from
It's the Amish people. And the BBC has made an impressive and moving documentary about them: Trouble in Amish paradise.
SJ: *smiles proudly*
Two people in 24hours killed by the same drug -GBL – Gamma-Butyrolactone. This is a class-C drugg, banned in the year 2009 following a spate of deaths. It has the similar effect as alcohol and ecstacy.
A similar group meets in Baltimore for the weekly teleconference. Hough has special ties to one of the other Texas participants — Charles Hough IV, his son, another former Episcopal clergyman who hopes to become a Catholic priest.
The ghosts of my Scottish ancestors – big and brawny and brave, I was sure – must have been shaking their heads in shame at their modern female relative, drunk on one glass.
. The relationship between boss and subordinate is rarely close/personal.
The LP mastering of the Gala Sequence (as with the SDD) is at a much lower-level than the orchestral recordings: that difference is retained here.
There are many misconceptions about haiku, and we will address those. Many people think they are writing haiku, when in fact, what they write may be a pretty, thoughtful image, but it doesn’t adhere to the form. Most of the haiku written today in English is not written in the five-seven-five syllable format–that is five syllables in the first line, seven in the second line, and five in the third. In fact, haiku doesn’t even have to be three lines long, as you may have learned in school. It can be anywhere from one to four lines.
Lula Lula Lula Lula bye bye,
We enter a routine. Netflix is brilliant. We watch a film and feed/change/wash. We rest for an hour or so, and then we start again. We have little energy to speak. But I tell you what, I don’t think a day goes by where we don’t laugh. There’s work to do, and we feel like shit, but I just know things are going to be OK.
Where they lie on the ground after the battle brought in,
Health coaches work in concert with the physician office, the hospital and the member to offer advice and guidance during a particular period of time. The idea is to make people more proactive about their health and lead them to become more self-sufficient.
Overall: 1.5/5 (half a star for Akshay Kumar, half a star for Johnny Lever and Chunky Pandey and half a star for Ranjeet)
I'm still looking for that perfect product that keeps my hair silky and smooth without being weighed down. Have you discovered any hair product/tools lately that you want to share? I'm always looking for new things to try!
EMPOWER PEOPLE was born in 2006 with an aim to work for victims of bride trafficking. When I was in March against Female Feticide in Haryana, I met a trafficked woman and decided to work on this issue. Now, Empower People is working as an umbrella organization for 20 CBOs across the country.
Is there anything more fun than the end of the world? Mass destruction, cataclysm, apocalypse --all favorite entertainment devices that lend themselves well to high drama, tension, action, terror, and, of course, amazing special effects. What draws us to fantasies about the destruction of our world?
Today we are introducing yet another whimsical and wonderful stamp set designed by Nina B Designs for The Craft's Meow called Tweet of You. To see the full cards, please click on the links below.
David, a rap artist who gets his message through to the low income youth in his city, preaches Constitutional limited government, and self-reliance. David is the real deal, having spent some time behind bars. That’s where David decided to take the steps to change his life and move it into a different direction. He found God, and became a witness to Jesus and the power of the Creator after returning to his community. So he has tremendous street cred with the kids, who will listen to him when they won’t pay attention to any one else.
Great variety of colors and styles
A mix, with mostly oldies. Any favorites in this list?
There will be a renowned church song writer presenting and playing for us. It's supposed to be pretty amazing, so be sure to come! And of course there will be delicious treats after wards.
I’ve made peace with the past, I’ve let go of a lot of emotional baggage and now I’m ready to move forward.
Main Dishes:
Someone smiled at me today,
The Mustangs, too, approached the game as a team with nothing to lose and everything to gain.
3 ore
The whole process took me about 4 hours, I get frustrated from time to time but it's worth it in the end.
The opposition was industrious, physically powerful and ruthless in capitalising on our two defensive errors. Arsenal was one-paced and short of ideas, especially after going behind in the second half.
Now for the CR84FN Challenge details:
So, the reason for all this rant has a dual purpose. Obviously, I am a proud member, DIYC is a fantastic sailing organization. DIYC may as well stand for do it yourself club. The other reason is that there are hundreds of clubs, sailing centers, sailing squadrons, etc . that provide similar enjoyment to their members and fellow sailors in those areas. I can mention several in my area that are similar in intent and efforts (DIYC still is the sailingest club in the south though). Plenty, that if I happened to live in their area, I would be a proud contributing member as well.
College education is not just about academics. A student participates in a number of extra curricular activities during his college years. He works on a number of presentations and assignments as well. Many experts in the field are often called at colleges to give lectures to the students. All these things help in molding the personality of a person. It is a known fact that higher education does help in improving a person's reasoning, analytical and problem solving skills. Also, many of the students stay away from their families for the first time in their lives during their college years. Thus, they tend to become more responsible and serious about life while studying at college.
9. Strength. We know how many calories skating can burn and we know that it also improves flexibility. However, it also strengthens your muscles and thickens your skin like any intense sport. When you stroke around the rink, every muscle in your legs, core, and arms are working in tandem to keep propelling you forward (or backwards). When you learn higher-level elements, like jumps or sit spins, you push your thigh muscles to do things that combine the best of what yoga masters, weight lifters, and high jumpers do all at once. Skating is amazing because the artistic side of it makes the physical side of it look so easy…but it’s not! Skating strengthens your muscles and endurance capacity in ways that other sports can only do in combination with other exercises.
I confidently examined the packaging, reached down to my right jeans pocket, and... uh-oh. I found myself forced to whimper "Uh, Marko, do you have a knife?" Which in itself is an inane question to me; what kind of adult goes about their business without a knife on their person?
Calling Muslims to the Capitol?
Culver doesn’t board on campus but they have a very diverse group of 100 horses to choose from. In addition to the Black Horse Troop, Culver has a competitive IEA hunt seat team, IEA stock seat team, a top-ranked polo team (the varsity team competes against colleges and other adult clubs!), a handful of drill teams (the Equestriennes and the Lancers), and a gymnastic team (the Rough Riders).
I airbrushed my stencils on using my Copic ABS. The heart stencil turned out really nicely, I did a color fade and then popped in up a little bit by adding some smudged charcoal to outline the heart and the star-burst. I also used the charcoal on the boarders, because they were too pretty and I needed them a little grungier. I had doodled the lines in the background and then added in the splatter stencil and dots stencil (both by Coffee Break) for a little bit of texture.
What a wild turn of events. Where to begin?
And maybe you'll understand better why I LOVE this commerical.
This novella was nominated for a Hugo in 1968. The result was a tie between “Riders Of The Purple Wage”-Phillip Jose Farmer and “Weyr Search”-Anne McCaffrey. Delany’s story originally appeared in the February 1967 edition of Worlds of Tomorrow.
And when Philip starts talking to this man on his chariot – a physically deformed eunuch who had travelled SO FAR to just get to the outer court – this encounter is DYNAMIC! The eunuch is reading His Old Testament Bible out loud – which was common in those days (in Greek)– and needs someone to explain the words of Isaiah! Philip asks him a question – and the man invites him into his chariot!
6. If you have websites, blogs, etc., be sure to include their URL’s and associated user names and passwords in your package. Detail exactly how you want to announce your passing and include an example statement that details how or if the site or your contributions to a site will continue in the future. I was surprised to find that I own or am a significant contributor to a large number of blogs and websites. Will my family take over in my place? We’ll have to talk about it and decide.
How do you come up with your titles? Is there a method to your madness?
Unfortunately living is expensive so I'm going to have to say good bye to indulgent lunches bought at the farm shop and say hello to lunch boxes. Fortunately I love lunch boxes. At the moment my challenge is to pack tasty, filling, nutrient packed, filling and really filling food to fill me up for a hard day of digging and playing in the garden.
In a statement, Chris Hunter, Jeff Wright and Jaisen Freeman, Phusion’s three co-founders and current managing partners said:
Le Pigonnet is a lovely restaurant if you're looking for something a little more formal and flash - we've only eaten here twice, but it gets our recommendation.
There is a strong musical, cultural and social connection between Jamaica and Ireland. The connection is even closer than that, as England shipped many Irish political prisoners to the West Indies to work as indentured servants in the last 1600's. As their terms of servitude finished, many of these Irish workers stayed in Barbados and Jamaica, infusing the local culture and music with their own traditions. The legacy of the Irish is still seen in Jamaican towns and neighborhoods with Irish names, such as Dublin Castle, Irish Pen, Irish town, Sligoville, Kildare, Leinster Road and Belfast. The Irish connection in Jamaica goes beyond the names of places. Similarities can be found in a shared history of colonial domination and the achievement of independence in the same century.
Lace: vintage craft supply
Charles-Antoine Blais would be 16 now, if he had not been seen as a burden and killed. I never found a photo of him, except for one in La Presse of his body being removed from his house, in his city, where his life was devalued and taken away from him. Ten years after he was murdered, autistics are still routinely described as devastating and as burdens, including by our political leaders. Charles-Antoine Blais' memory has not been respected.
a couple of years ago, I moved the burn pile further back which left this big burned spot where it used to be. I tried to turn as much of the charcoal and ash into the ground as I could but it still looked pretty black. It's back there at the back of the property in the last 5' feet of our proper boundary at the end of the drain field.
I'd go a step further. If a doctor tried to get me to stop taking hormones based on some life-risk - not gonna happen. It's not negotiable. I'm a lifer.
I read that the rocks on the tombstones are a Jewish way of paying respect. And, when I looked at the stones I'd taken photos of, they do have the Star of David on them, though I also saw one with a cross.
You all knew this was coming. FNL may now be over for good, but it is one show that will stay with me forever. In its final season we see Coach Taylor, arguably the most honorable character ever, and Tami Taylor try to fix all the problems the young people of Dillon, TX have. The Taylor’s relationship remains the greatest marriage to ever be portrayed in fiction — in probably any medium, actually — as the writers prove that you don’t have to have a bunch of relationship drama and nonsense to make a relationship compelling to watch. The final season of Friday Night Lights marked the end of the time we will spend in Dillon, but we will remember the people forever. When Coach Taylor stands before his new team and says his trademark, “Clear Eyes, Full Hearts, Can’t Lose” speech to his young, confused players, I sat at the edge of my seat as the all-too-familiar powerful words once again brought tears to my eyes as the lights went out for the last time. Goodbye to the show that taught me more life lessons than my actual life did, and goodbye to the show that I was able to relate to the most. I will miss you most of all. Once more, with feeling: “Clear eyes. Full hearts. Can’t lose.”
At least six Catholic parishes in Washington state have ignored the Seattle Archbishop’s call to gather signatures for a referendum repealing the state’s recently-enacted marriage equality law, calling the effort “hurtful and seriously divisive in our community.” “Seattle’s Our Lady of the Lake Catholic Church gave the Rev. Tim Clark a standing ovation Sunday” when he announced that the parish would not be participating in the anti-equality effort:
Give me your feedback my friends. Help me see clearly. Give me your best shot~so to speak. Thanks.
So remember, middle-aged America, the next time anyone tries to face you up about some of your food horror stories, you just show them this. And don't forget to tell them...it gets worse.
Yet his analysis of the circumstances by which such an end might be reached is, as always, spot-on:
Purple loosestrife has been used as a lymphatic cleanser. Many of its other properties are similar to those attributed to other species. It may be particularly valuable as a remedy for many of today’s gastrointestinal (GI) tract diseases, such as Crohn’s disease, irritable bowel syndrome, leaky gut syndrome, and others, as it is an effective cure for diarrhea and is also an effective anti-inflammatory, with healing properties.
There are two immediately pertinent issues here:
Maria x
But as part of organization,
Admittedly, one of the big draws for me was the quintessential Standard American Diet (SAD) food that was available in almost every conceivable form. In many ways, Disney set the SAD standard with its offerings, a Supreme Offering Standard American Diet (SoSAD) if you will.
We know he's here to stay.
Making collages is something I have greatly enjoyed doing for years. I love the whole process, the intuitiveness and magic of it. I love making meaning out of randomness, taking images that seem to have nothing to do with each other and interlacing them.
I often use an example from my dissertation, of a large table that regularly moved around a den area at Evergreen Adventure Playground. I mapped its movements each day for a week.
we were on our own, we headed to Carmine's for a family style italian dinner and
Within the 48 states, 2 - 3 business days not including Holidays Contact us for additional charge quote
Finally, it has been rumored that Lady Gaga herself is a huge wine fan and is considering launching her own brand. Perhaps that’s what Gaga Winery has been counting on all along.
The final course was served with Kasteel Cru Rose. Like most beer geeks, it’s not a beer I care for that much, but Steve had his reasons for matching it with the dessert. Not a single one of the CAMRA guys would even touch it. They were disgusted, insulted, seemingly forgetting that this was not a CAMRA dinner, and that CAMRA has not financed the £700,000 reopening of the brewery centre. A private leisure company had, and Molson Coors – license owners of Kasteel Cru – had.
You must be anchored! Just like in the previous post, if you aren’t securely planted in your Godly ways, your past habits and distractions around you will engulf you without any hesitation. One way to stay anchored is to have the Word of God in your mind, always.
All of this was on her list of things to avoid thinking about. And it was right up there with the fact that David had a serious girlfriend. Cassandra Stevens. They had been dating for three years now. But Rachel cheered herself up by reminding herself that Hollywood relationships almost always failed. Of course that made her feel very guilty and conflicted. If she truly cared about David, shouldn't she want him to be happy? Did she want him brokenhearted? Okay. Yes. But quickly recovered in her arms.
In terms of my artistic formation, the last couple of years have involved learning to take risks artistically by recognizing that the alternative (the hip, disinterested and neutral approach) only stifles artistic expression and relational growth. The illusion of deep self-awareness does little to elicit creativity and even less to bring about authentic relationships. I have learned that I am a Songwriter (cue triumphant self-revelatory music!). Processing life through song is how I was made to function. Does my work have to be received well by all in order to be perceived as legitimate? Is that even possible? Writing music is part of a healthy cycle of reflection for me: I learn, I internalize, I process, I write a song and I share it with someone. It’s usually my husband, Joe, my children who are so annoyed that I am holding my guitar instead of playing with them that it’s counterproductive (“listen to mommy’s new song, dang it!”), a friend, or an audience at a show. It’s a relational process as much as an artistic process. We risk relationally when we risk artistically. We take something we have created and offer it, along with a part of ourselves, to the audience, hearer, viewer or reader. The response of the audience member is important but it does not contain the power to legitimize an individual’s artistic endeavor. It’s in us and we either ignore it (whatever the reason may be) and feel the negative effects on our souls or embody it and come more fully into who we were made to be. Having been formed by a Divine Artist to function in very specific ways, we have the freedom along with the responsibility to explore and lean into who we were made to be. This is for the betterment of ourselves, the fuller and more complete expression of corporate living and, ultimately, for the glory of our Maker who has formed us to be co-creators with Him. So, go forth and risk. Then tell me about it and I will write you a song because that is what I do.
A group of fewer than 100 supporters chanted against what the organisation sees as the militant rise of Islam as they were escorted through the town by police.
Linda Naidoo, director of Childline, said the statistics were cause for immediate action by the police.
I look forward to being inspired by you!
Young cousin Jonas, one of the children who had to jump to avoid Hannah’s body, immediately ran to the kitchen door, stuck his head in, and yelled in his loudest little-boy voice, “Someone bring a light! There’s been a hurt!”
Best Writing for Adapted Screenplay: I said Moneyball. The real winner: The Descendants.
Arete explains everything he is doing and why. He explains what vein is in that part of the leg, arm, hand. He knows how many layers of skin or muscle lay on top of it. He explains exactly what happens when said vein is punched, kicked, sliced.
How important is a excellent fluency regarding English for college students today? The answer is it is very important. Learning English or every other language online isn’t for everyone, but even for the people people that chose a school for understanding, online resources generally is a great supplement for your language learning procedure. Traveling around metropolis should be not a problem since there are quite a few numbers of methods of transportation. Either your teacher or another student should know the phrase. teacherspayteachers Elizabeth Fort was built-in 1603 and was important in the Irish showdown of Independence along with the Civil War which will followed. You can do that by extra studying, or simply simply by writing anything. As you get more vocabulary start to have much more confidence with speaking with other English folks. Students need tuition that connects grammar points with large communication contexts, and not larger grammar connected frameworks. If you want to speak perfect English then you certainly always need to be effective on the pronunciation. It is imperative not to ever disapprove of though listening, and for no reason attack another person for his / her feelings.
"It needs to be blue and soft. It needs a bright pink love heart on it... oh and it has to have my name on it".
Before she could speak again he slapped a wide strip of silver insulating tape across her mouth.
Week THREE- Cool Shades
I strung 4 lines across the frame. I tucked the string up under the frame and hot glued it. I would have done this before I put it in the frame but I didn't know exactly what I was going to do until I did it :)
27. November: Le Vigean – Bordeaux. France
Who, you might ask is John Donatich and how did I find him? That's an especially apt question when you consider that my library system only owns one copy of his first book and it's improperly catalogued. I'll have to check usage and see if anyone else accidentally came upon him.
I wanted to try out my new Fyrinnae colours, so I did a look with three of them today. I was a bit surprised that Polar Bear was so yellowish on my skin, I hardly ever wear yellow and was expecting it to be much lighter and just have a golden sheen, but in the end it worked fine. The BB-cream is also new, as my MAC foundation seems to be a bit too dark for me this time of year. I'll do a review when I've used it for some time. It was so nice and sunny outside I even wore hotpants! Although with thick stockings ;)
It’s even more important than ever to come up with a good idea. An idea that can work across all channels and where each channel can communicate a different, self-contained element of the brand narrative but in combination with exposure to others will build to create a larger brand world. A 360 idea.
After she was grabbed her from her yard, Hope encountered a new breed of human. She stared through crusty cage wires at indifference, greed, and evil. The indifference hurt the most. She was sick, she was sad, she was so tired. She felt madness licking closer.
“Ah. Enough said. Let the self-flagellation continue. I’ll stay quiet.”
CATSCALLION: the wild card. Cats as jokers, popping up in the most unexpected places for no logical narrative purpose other than to introduce a major human character, provide a surreal non-sequitur or screw around with someone's brain. (The Third Man, The Man With Two Brains, Go, La peau douce, La nuit Américaine, The Prestige)
I noticed that he likes to eat sweet food. To funny that he has a sucker in his hand for the photo!!
WHEN: August 18, 7-11pm
“I did!”
It is also notable that there were no major wars and only a few "national liberation" skirmishs in the New World (Cuba, Nicaragua, etc.).
and stop playing the race card
My movement so slow plodding
The Yardbirds: Dazed And Confused
Personal Assistant to participant with disability (includes full conference and conference dinner): €0.00
In some cases, money moved in amounts — tens of millions of dollars at a clip — that made no sense, given the business models and potential sales of the companies involved.
Through the day in these heels.
Watching the development of JGS and Yoona’s modern times characters’ love story is very entertaining. Compared to the 70′s which was very withheld, they express themselves better in the modern times making it much more fun and exciting to the viewers. In case anyone’s wondering the love story of the 70′s couple continues. What’s sad is their the parents of the modern times kids so if ever they end up together the modern kids can’t which is sad because they’re great with each other. So currently the drama is in a point wherein the love story of the parents is getting in the way of the relationship of their children. Hopefully though the director is famous for his tear-jerking dramas I’ll get more smiles out of this one.
I’d heard some positive noise about Marche’s book, and at first glance that noise seemed well-founded. Marche clearly loves Shakespeare and wants to share his excitement with the rest of us. To create a facade of respectability in his life while embarking on a career as a novelist, Marche pursued a PhD; his subject of research was Shakespeare. “I chose Shakespeare because I thought he would never bore me. And I was right. He has never bored me.” Likewise, Marche never bored me. He did frustrate and disappoint me though.
~ At the end of the day we are all doing what we truly believe is right for our child/ren and family at the time. We all love our children, and it does no one any favours, in particular our children who are listening and watching us more than we realise, to be rude to people, either to their face or behind their backs.
Little did I know, it was my meticulous following recipes to a T that was the problem. In the past, I've followed chilli (the dish) recipes that were "kid-friendly", with notes like "we like this a little mild, so this doesn't have too much of a chilli-bite" and I've thought to myself, "Wow, cookbook authors have kids that love insane amounts of heat in their chilli", but it's been tolerable/delicious, and we've been fine. All that changed recently.
I have to work all day on Saturday. Fortunately, the book store has big windows, so I can watch as all the shit goes down. Unfortunately, Monsieur Camping does not provide a time. Hell, it's already May 21st in Australia!!! I'm personally hoping that the college girls are hanging out in the store, because when shit goes down, I'm taking full advantage of the confusion. My go to line? "Well, you're fucked anyway, so..."
Director : Sanjay Punjabi
Know More About High Heel Shoes
So on Tuesday my neighbor upstairs told me that there is a snow storm
A year passed and her heart is still “busy” with him, but it was still her biggest secret, no one knows except her best friend. Her relationship with him was still considered as “friends”. But she noticed something strange! She noticed that whenever his sister arround he treats her in a different way, he gets really rude with her and he starts to mock in front of every one. She was really shocked by his sudden behavior. She tried to speak to him and ask him what was wrong with him or whether she did something wrong but all she got from him is a complete ignorance. She got really sad and she felt that she lost him and her relationship with him will not be the same any more.
I think before we can access what state the publishing industry is in right now, we must first look at where it has been and the reasons why it has reached such a pivotal and directionless state. It is not surprising that the industry, like many, has pedalled along and mirrored the rises and falls in the standard of living and economic recessions.
By LENORE SKENAZY
A sex scene is a scene first, sex later.
I had some of these bright fun colored flowers already punched out and left over from a different project, and I knew I wanted to use them on this card.
I was delighted to hear that the prostitute who siphoned Hugh’s manly fluids has thrived and prospered. Stella Marie Thompson (alias Miss Divine Brown) made a small fortune from the media interest in her escapade, allowing her to move into a four-bedroom house and put her daughters through private school.
MAKE THIS VIRAL!
What is the best part about having your book released in May?
II
But still, you persevere. I walked down your streets last year, with my wife and kids. And you welcomed them, too. We saw some of the blemishes, though. Those 'Night Flowers', sung to by our very own Silvio Rodríguez, still populate your famous roads, Fifth Avenue, 23rd Street, Malecón.
And there have been so many great songs through the years — rock and jazz and a bit of things in between — that have involved memorable Hammond playing.
Sure enough the bus that has already left rolls up 20 minutes later and we finally bid farewell to this spectacular, cut off world.
According to Michigan Supreme Court spokeswoman Marcia McBrien, the first anyone at the Supreme Court heard of the allegations was in August of 2011.
They have another side too. For years working with oil spill response, I had to wear a hard hat during the drills and training sessions I observed. The only time I ever really needed one was when I ventured too close to a tern's nest. Talk about being dive bombed, they hit the hat, hard and I had to beat it out of there, watching very carefully where I stepped as I made my escape because they lay their well-camouflaged eggs exposed among rocks.
c) Increased by Euro 900million
Jeremiah 29:11
Commenting on his new role, Koroi has advised “that he is thrilled to take on the new challenges of the Customer Care role, to ensure that all the guests requirements and requests are meet while they are on site and working with the Management team at Sonaisali for the betterment of the resort.”
Reliable, trustworthy websites exist where you can sign up and start making money immediately simply from filling in your opinions and thoughts, the key is to sort the good companies from the bad. Without taking time or advice on which company to use you are playing bingo and could end up wasting money and time. So, if you don’t have a friend who can point you in the right direction, your best bet is to do some research in the Internet before you sign up anywhere.
So as much as the Military Religious Freedom Foundation might erupt into a frenzy at the very thought of Christian proselytizing, these hypocrites are all too willing to engage in massive proselytizing of their own. They impose their atheistic worldview in the name of “religious tolerance” or “religious neutrality” all the time. When in fact it is anything but, being a small extremist minority worldview, and when in fact it has the most gruesome history of ANY worldview in the form of state atheism, i.e. communism.
So what do you think? My customer just LOVED them!!
Nice seats. Hopefully they, as well as the 10,207 others in attendance, stayed the entire 2 hours and 43 minutes.
Eggplants are easy to start from seed. See our sidebar for our favorite seed suppliers. We prefer to start our seeds in pots, but direct sowing is also fine. The seeds are fairly small, so don't plant too deeply. Keep moist until germination, and then be sure to protect the seedlings from any late frost. Temperatures must be warm for the seeds to germinate, so you may consider starting seeds indoors if the ambient temperature is still chilly in your area. Here in Houston we're already hitting the high 70's and low 80's during the day making it perfect eggplant-starting weather.
1 Corinthians 15: 50-54 says, “I declare to you, brothers and sisters, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the kingdom of God, nor does the perishable inherit the imperishable. Listen, I tell you a mystery: We will not all sleep, but we will all be changed— in a flash, in the twinkling of an eye, at the last trumpet. For the trumpet will sound, the dead will be raised imperishable, and we will be changed. For the perishable must clothe itself with the imperishable, and the mortal with immortality. When the perishable has been clothed with the imperishable, and the mortal with immortality, then the saying that is written will come true: “Death has been swallowed up in victory.”
Anyway, kids, I love you. Today I'm going for a three hour and 45 minutes course after office hours. That means I won't be home to help you with your homework. To nag you to have them done fast so you can rest before bedtime. Or to nag you to check the books you are supposed to take to school tomorrow. Or to scowl when you don't tidy up your stuffs (which most of the time you end up not tidying up anyway). I won't be home to give you dinner (so you'll have to clean up on your own- no excuses like having to go to the loo right after putting your dishes in the sink!).
We have sunny days here! MashaAllah, its such an amazing feeling to really enjoy the sun! So many dark days in the winter make you appreciate the bright sunny days on a different level. I wonder how many people who has been living all their live in finland really do know the worth of the absolute stunning nature here?
Jumier's PVP Maximum Healing Build
By Christmas 2010, after moving to Sweden, I had attended workshops, writing groups, and conferences, devoured books on writing and editing, cycled through several more drafts (each time convincing myself it was the last), and amassed an impressive pile of rejections.
should contact a medical professional for further evaluation of possible spinal injury.
It seemed like every song in my mix hit at just the right time to either pump me up or remind me to keep my pace even. Songs like "The Good Stuff" by Sid Maudlin and "Send Your Love" by Sting, remixed version and finally the best one, right at the end, "Straight Ahead" by Tube and Berger. "Straight Ahead" hit as I was on a straight away towards my endpoint. I did 4.3 miles in 38:30. :) I am now in a fantastic mood and can't wait for all of my fall runs!
Mi Roo knows her mom’s had a couple of boyfriends in her youth. She admits to having 12 lovers which shocks her mome but then she assumes Mi Roo’s inflating the truth. Wondering how her mom doesn’t have any romance in her life, she concludes that it must be because her mom’s a married woman. Therefore she’s anonymous to all other men.
For men may come and men may go,
I must admit, I was in a quagmire when it came to quantity and quality whilst quantifying Q words. I quickly quarrelled with a quartet of options and queued them up as I quietly quenched my quest by quickly ascertaining which would produce the quirkiest quips. Eventually, I decided to talk about the Quakers.
The second phase of drilling is planned to involve the spudding of a de-lineation well on the discovery, likely to be followed by an exploration well on one of the neighbouring prospects within the area captured by 3D seismic survey. Additional 3D seismic is also planned to be acquired from midyear to further delineate leads on trend and similar to the Zaedyus discovery mapped on 2D seismic along the length of the deepwater margin.
I think it comes down to fear. A lot of pregnancy fear comes from the feeling that a person is going to be out of control. During pregnancy your body is not your own it is the domain of another and they aren’t going to treat it that nicely. The idea that things will be the same afterwards sort of works to soothe those feelings of fear and makes it all alright. However, all this does it put a lot of pressure on women who may already be at breaking point.
Internet : Amazing speeds, Bing, Internet Explorer 9, HTML5, Wi-Fi
My wife’s part of a category of vegetarians that are very few in number: “fowletarians”; i.e. people who are pretty much vegetarian most of the time, except when they’re eating chicken or turkey. Since her consumption of fowl is actually quite limited, and is usually undertaken at Thai or Vietnamese restaurants or on Thanksgiving, we eat at a lot of vegetarian places when we go out so she can actually enjoy herself. Me, I’m very cool with vegetarian food as long as it doesn’t get to be my lifestyle, you know what I mean? We went to a fantastic, semi-legendary San Francisco vegetarian restaurant this past weekend called GREENS, and the food is so good and so rich you wouldn’t even know there wasn’t animal flesh being served. Oh, and they serve a rich variety of small-brewer beers, most of them organic, which is what I’d like to discuss today.
I often have a laugh about Ireland's Wicklow Mountain tunnel as when my stepfather was asleep next to his friend the coach driver that asked him a quicker way to where they were going... Waking my stepfather up still half asleep he said, turn right at...
Thank you for your visit and for your sweet comments!!
Love love love biker boots, they are edgy yet flat so they can be worn all day long!
More specifically, Sun Gem-Moon Sag shows one who is intellectual, curious, impatient yet friendly, and a flamboyant communicator. This eternal student and scholar can display emotional immaturity and an outspoken nature while attracting many friends including poets and idealists.
Personal Attributes: a. Strong and innovative approach to problem solving and finding
I think this is a pretty good query letter as it stands. The paranormal stuff is going to move it off my request list but I can see someone reading pages on this pretty easily.
Some specific points of interest:
I got a blog award!
According to The Hill, Gibbsy didn’t attend the last press conferance. Bill Burton says he’s got a cold in his nose. At least he didn’t say he wanted to spend more time with his family.
Except the fact that I don’t have a passport…
On Wee Z's first birthday, we had 2 small parties for him with various family members and friends. On the Saturday before his birthday my Dad, Grandma and younger Sister came to visit. The sun was splitting the sky and it was a really lovely day. We had a picnic in the garden and my Sister helped Wee Z play with his new toys.
2. Haggard: Wild in appearance or extreme weight loss due to starvation or disease
That story takes an honest investigative look at the IoM and what its report really says. The old “dinosaur” media, as usual, has predictably twisted this story around and falsely claimed that it gives vaccines a clean bill of health. Only NaturalNews (and other alternative media organizations) dares tell the truth while questioning the IoM’s financial ties and funding sources. The entire mainstream media blindly accepts the IoM’s “authority” as beyond reproach, neglecting to conduct basic journalism and follow the money as NaturalNews is doing.
They marry in tiaras of ringpulls, give gifts, recycling the best of our worst. Time is unkind too... Although the traditional gift for a first anniversary is paper towels, or even scraps, they appreciate anything.
U Roy, Bob Dylan, Bob Marley, Duffy, Joan Armatrading, Cold Play, JayZ, Adele, Pretenders, UB40 and Manu Chao.
Finally we’ve come to the last installment in this series about the affect Anne Lamott’s chapter “Hunger” has had on my life. To catch up on the rest of the story you can go here.
There is no rule in BM that says one should write prose from English literature or take pictures that will fit a glossy magazine. However a certain degree of these are required to make a good read, which your readers will appreciate and will make them loyal readers.
Salary: Based on experience
Writing is a tough industry. We get told over and over again, “No thanks, not today.” The rejection can be brutal, but our writing is not trash and it’s certainly nothing to throw away. Sometimes Laura brings home something in need of repair or out-dated, like this little beauty. This picture frame was purchased for $2.00 at Goodwill.
I removed all the random items, and put them in their proper homes. Then I sorted through all the papers in the bottom pic, and put them back in their proper homes, since these are ones I use frequently, their homes are usually close at hand. Next up, I went through all our files, and weeded out anything that wasn't needed. Good bye old outdated bills, if I can find the info online, I don't need to keep it. Other than current bills in our "Finance" binder, all the other ones are in the shred bag, and non important items are in the recycle pile. So what did I end up keeping:
It's a brave idea, to make comedy from the Holocaust's poster girl ('Thirty-two million copies..that's nothing to sneeze at!') but the sheer audacity of it, not to mention the confidence with which he sees it through, means that Auslander gets away with it. He's not the first writer to imagine Anne Frank as a survivor, Philip Roth did so to great effect in The Ghost Writer (his first Zuckerman novel), but to imagine it with such black comedy is the mark of a brave humorist. Frank has remained captive in that loft for good reason of course, those thirty-two million copies didn't sell because of a happy ending, and her agent has very simple advice about the best way for things to continue: "stay dead". Up in the attic she remains, working on her next book, the pages piling up around her. Kugel too is trapped by the situation, whether that woman in the attic really is Anne Frank or not, the weight of history means there is very little he can do.
My recurring dream is back. It's been a while since I last dreamed it and I would've been quite happy if it never revisited me. It's about as disturbing as any dream I can remember. I used to have a couple pet Cockatiels years ago and one of them was especially sweet and dear to me. In the dream I go down into a part of our basement that's secluded from the rest of our house, a place where I seldom go. When I open the door I find the bird cage with both Coocoo and Coconut inside. I'm shocked because I've totally forgotten that they were there and it's been months since I've fed them or given them fresh water. They're so neglected although they don't appear to be but I feel terrible and I'm profoundly sad. It ends about as quickly as it begins. It usually occurs to me the next morning that I had the dream again and it leaves me both disturbed and with a sense of relief that it was only a dream.
The onslaught continued with 400 hurdler Isa Phillips besting Defending World champion Kerron Clement in the stretch for an easy 48.18 to 48.51 win. With the meet ending with Kerron Stewart (JAM) running away from the women's 200 meter field in a strong negative wind to win going away in 20.72.
2.After Hours (Demo)
We were punished in 1971 because we had forgotten the promise that we had made to Allah. After the war of 1971, the world was thinking that survival for even West Pakistan would be challenging. But they were wrong.
Thirdly, I might actually get to meet some running bloggers! Jocelyn, Laura, and Emilia are going to running Nashville too, so I’m hoping we can meet up to compare post-race notes and obsess over splits and paces the way only runners can.
Then Tor came into the room, and wow, he looked sharp and handsome!
Self: “Do you remember any of what he said about the book?”
The "prototype steam engine" referred to here is the tiny aeolipile of Heron, a cute little toy that would never have led to an actual steam engine given the metals technology of the time. The "mechanical computer" seems to be a reference to the Antikythera mechanism, an astronomical calculator of a kind that continued to be produced for centuries later, without ushering in any "industrial revolution". And the Church preserved Greek science, thanks substantially to the insistence of another learned Alexandrine, Clement, who stressed that all knowledge was from God and that Greek rationalism was to be revered and not rejected. But who wants to let pesky facts get in the way of pretty myths?
Some bloggers do themes like veganizing recipes from a certain cookbook, recipes for certain television shows or using unusual spices. I wasn't going to do a theme but then as I thought about it, it hit me: The "V" Word can celebrate Veganism with the other 25 letters of the alphabet! So each entry will be a post (recipe, book review, product review, thoughts, etc.) based on one letter of the alphabet other than "V."
Charcoal Chalk Inkpad (optional)
I have no managed to ‘cull’ all the pics yet but here’s a select few as Claire and her girls were getting ready:
S and I are sitting in a community meeting. "Take a sip of our water," they offer me a steel cup. I pass it to S who takes a sip unflinchingly. I will not be shamed. I take a sip next hoping my cowardice would pass for deference. "It tastes okay," I say. "No it does not, says a village elder. It is salty. Our minds have been destroyed. We are all a little bit mad now. We do not even remember anything." I scan the crowd for signs of madness, and we laugh. Amidst the laughter the elder's son who looks a bit like Vivek Oberoi, surma in his eyes, says: "Eat fish here. Have a drink of water at Sehwan." More laughter. S doesn't laugh. He tells me he has met many communities and this is one of the most destitute because there isn't much to plant either without the water. NGOs come with timely gifts and tall promises, but the solution needs to be more holistic. WAPDA has installed a filtration plant, and some find reprieve.
I am entering this into the following challenge:
3So Adoni-zedek, king of Jerusalem, sent to Hoham, king of Hebron, and to Piram, king of Jarmuth, and to Japhia, king of Lachish, and to Debir, king of Eglon, saying,
Those photo-specific supplies, however, occasionally work really well on cards, and these kraft photo corners were perfect for my white/kraft/pop of turquoise two-layer card.
Add to that the fact that no matter who you are, you will have plenty of friends and family in South Africa. If you are like me, you feel strongly about why you had to leave (you’d have to – see the paragraph about why it is hard). When I feel strongly about something, I tend to want to proselytise others into my way of thinking. To me, getting out was a matter of life and death.
So, in the warm and honest tradition of Ale Stars, Prof. Pilsner was offered the gig. Actually, truth be told, we were having a few quiet ‘afters’ at the bar last month when Justin and Guy told me I had it because when the music stopped, I hadn’t found a chair. That’s the way the game’s played.
Old people keep lists. It’s what we do. Lists keep us organized, productive and help us to remember things when our memory starts to fade. They also keep us organized. In addition to the standard “grocery list”, “to-do list” and “neighbors that may be communist sympathizers list” that you’d find in any decent American household, I maintain over 200 other active lists at any given time.
The bad news was that I had been asked to remove the memory card from that camera while it was being repaired, and I never put it back in, for the trip.
8) Bring sunblock
Select the hearts you want to use.
_____What you people won't do for a "Like" around here . . . If ya all don't like this status you can all kiss my a**!! (funny like)
so I do plan to post while there and share with you the beauty of the Canadian Rockies!!
When she was researching him the illustrator of Tales for Great Grandchildren, Daniela Jaglenka Terrazzini, had found this story of Chhepu’s creation. He is seen in his story, for the first time possibly, with a body. Daniela also studied his depiction in traditional paintings before adding her ‘little touch of rhinoceros.’ ‘The rhinoceros is an animal that I find incredibly fascinating in his strange mix of primordial, aggressive and cute at the same time,’ she says.
The goal here is not to ADD MEDICATIONS, the goal here is to eliminate them, if not completely, then nearly to the point of as close to zero as possible. And I think that is achievable.
The Daughter that Never Was
If this message comes from her, then she is very brave for asking scientologists to stop donating to the IAS and any other Scientology fundraisings as well as exposing the truth about what is happening in upper management. I wish that she had done this 20 years ago.
The present drift of these two bodies toward Roman Catholic ecclesiology as well as Roman Catholic doctrine and practice is a continuation of the Episcopal Church’s drift in the nineteenth and twentieth century in the same direction. However those who favor this retrograde movement may justify it, this regression to unreformed Western Catholicism represents a counter-Reformation in North America, and threatens the very survival of authentic historic Anglicanism not only on the North American subcontinent but also in other parts of the world.
Von Zwillingen and his men took their part in most of the military actions in the following two years from the Moledur Peninsula to the march to Dorossaibeth. In the end of the war, though respectfully under the command of the Colonel of the Fricklander Grenz, Franz Wohl, Friedrich was promoted to Lieutenant Colonel. After his coronation, Chovaion Sallagen XV, the new King of Jackewline, gave him the title Maered, one of the eight original dynasties of the Jackewlinese realm, and an estate including Fergh Mackowskill, house of the dynasty (no foreigner had earned such things ever in Jackewline, the closest being the Kiesternewian Admiral Skyfarski, who was made a count and a honorable Jackewlinese after the sea battle of Kap Navidat). The family, still in Neu-Klermant, Malacha, sold all their belongings and travelled there, where they lived a prosperous life. Zwillingen died of old age, being 78, respected in his motherland and in Jackewline as well. He had been promoted to Colonel lately, already in his sixties and in pension, never to be afraid of lacking any money.
comfortable. We’re just a couple of Sr Citizens….”
I wanted to be on the road by 10am and of course we didn't actually leave Virginia until 3pm...but we finally arrived 12 hours later, with a little scenic detour through the very steep and curvy mountain roads of Pennsylvania. Once we arrived, we grabbed some pillows and blankets from the truck and passed out around 4:00 this morning.
Underlying Malema's childish outburst is the idea that the ANC, as the embodiment of the people's will, is the supreme power in the land. There is no understanding that the Constitution is supreme, that South Africa is a constitutional state with an independent judicial system, which is insulated from political influence by the beautiful doctrine of a separation of powers.
dress — Horny Toad (Horny Toad)
and see her hold another's hand.
When my father-in-law tried to do the "Luke" line, Ryan totally turned on him and said "you are not my father, I'm a grand kid!" Absolutely hilarious...I tell you the older these kids get, the funnier they are and the more fun we have with them.
General consensus between friends, enemies, and people who were on the scene is that there is no way Sid would ever have killed Nancy even if he had been physically able to wield a knife the night of her death. Through interviews with a detective who worked on the case, people who were in and out of Sid and Nancy's apartment that night, and people who were at the party at Sid's mother's apartment the night Sid died under mysterious circumstances, we get a fresh list of suspects. Six people were wanted for questioning by the NYPD but after Sid's death, no one cared to hunt them down. Now, the six names are blacked out of paperwork. Chilling coincidences followed, including the presence of Rockets Redglare, a drug addicted man born hooked on heroine to parents from an Italian-American mob family who gave Nancy 40 delauded pills that night, handfuls of people who saw Sid passed out and utterly unresponsive, and the bizarre condition and placement of the murder weapon when police arrived. Friends and admirers of Sid give their theories on Nancy's murder, Sid's overdose, and his mother's suicide.
So instead of calling goals "goals",
The rally opened a little woodenly as Deb Howard of the Pratt Area Community Council, a member of both BrooklynSpeaks and the Council of Brooklyn Neighborhoods, the third co-sponsor, read a statement that, without the commercial and residential component around the arena, the project “won’t be able to meaningfully fulfill the promises” made.
There was no sound with the Witnessing - just as with Clearsight - but the figures clearly exchanged words. One grabbed the human, pulled him to his feet, then lowered him slowly into the floor as if it was mud. He ended up buried to the waist in solid stone, pawing frantically at it. The Wildren turned to leave, and the bubble popped neatly.
I’ve already pushed this book onto one of our other reviewers and reiterated some of the stories to the other reviewers. No one is safe. I’ll be buying a copy of this book to reread when I need a laugh and also because the ARC version I read didn’t have the pictures that were referred to in the stories. Some of those you can see in the book trailer, but I think rereading it with the pictures intact will somehow make me able to give a 6 out of 5 rating instead of 5/5. Yep. She’s that funny.
Phil Collins’ beautifully complete and well-ordered drum kit. It is almost a sculpture in
8. Ricki-Lee "Can't Touch It"
Regardless of how old you are remember what it was like to be foot loose fancy free and nine years old.
He bugged me about all night.
